CHAPTER I.
By
the side of one of those romantic trout-streams that are embosomed
in the glens of New-England, was to be seen, just before sunset of an
afternoon
in September, 1841, a group composed of three figures. The place
in which they were was deeply secluded. Around them rose the huge
columnar
trunks of a forest which had been ancient when the first Pilgrim
Father set his foot upon the western shores. Through the forest, which
covered upland and intervale, flowed the dark wild waters of the brook,
upon
the banks of which they were assembled. The forest was solemn and
grand, and its long vistas seemed like the huge gothic aisles of an old-world
cathedral. The brook gambolled through this fine old wood in many a
wanton circle, now sweeping swiftly around a smooth-faced rock, and now
dividing to embrace huge oaks, whose heavy wide-spread branches dipped
into the flood. In the darkest part of the wood it fell tumbling over ragged
rocks in snow-white cataracts that glittered and flashed like silver
contrasting
the deep green and blackness of the shadows around.
At the spot where the group was seen, it flowed still and deep, its
waters being black and motionless as a pool, and reflecting in their
mirror-like bosom every mammoth branch, limb, tendril and leaf that
grew above it; also, a small strip of the pure bright blue sky that opened
between the trees was seen far, far down in its depths. As the stream
passed
away on its course it went gurgling over a shallow bed and struggled amid
a wilderness of confusedly heaped rocks, moss-grown and half clad in
foliage
,
before it emptied into a broader and more quiet stream. At its
junction
the trees opened and permitted a sunny view of a distant meadow, with
the spire of a village church beyond it, and upon the side of a hill were
visible
amid the grove in which it stood the chimnies and portico and
imposing
out-buildings of a gentleman's country-residence. Nearer the water,
shaded by a noble elm of great antiquity, stood a very humble farm-house,
over-run with wood-bine, and forming a picturesque object in the pleasant
scene which the opening in the forest rendered visible. The group
consisted
,
we have said, of three figures, not of three persons, for the third
member of the group was a fine large brown dog, half Newfoundland, half
mastiff. The two persons were young men, nearly about the same age,
neither of them being above three and twenty; but here all resemblance
terminated. One of them was a remarkably good-looking and well-dressed
young gentleman, with that air and appearance, which at a glance showed
that he belonged to what is termed `good society.' Though his attire was
fashionable it was far from being buckish; but on the contrary in good taste,
and worn with that easy, graceful negligence which distinguishes the truly
bred young man from his imitators. In a word, Edward Austin would
never
have been mistaken for a journeyman tailor on a holiday. He was
engaged
in angling; and the better to enjoy his ease he was reclined at his
length upon the thick, soft grass with his hand pillowed upon the
moss-covered
root of the vast oak which grew above him and cast its shade far over
the water. His vest was open, his cravat loosely knotted in front, and
instead
of a broad-cloth dress-coat he was habited in a very becoming and
well-cut blowse. By his side on the ground lay a huge brimmed straw hat,
that looked as if it had seen service, and by it stood an ivory box with
several
compartments containing flies, hooks, sennet, cork, hair-line, and the
other appurtenances of a practised amateur angler. On the other side stood
a basket, from which, from time to time, a speckled trout would fling himself
a foot or two into the air, revolve in a circling and graceful summerset, and
then fall to lay quiet among his fellows. This basket was guarded by the
two fore-paws of
Bruce
, the fine animal having placed them on each side of
it as if to see that none of its restless tenants escaped. It was plain that
he did not much like the frequent demonstrations towards freedom made by
the trout in their saltations in the air, and his large hazel eye would expand
and dilate as he gazed after some one of them ready to spring upon it if
should not happen to descend to its place in the basket. His assiduous
anxiety
touching their security was betrayed in every lineament of his
intelligent
and dignified visage, and was the source of not a little amusement to
the third figure of our group. This was a young man whose chief physical
characteristic was fat. He was a juvenile Falstaff in shape and feature.
Though at least twenty three years of age, he had cheeks like a well-fed
infant
,
fair and rosy. His face was the very picture of mirth and content.
His mouth wore a pleasant smile and his blue eyes sparkled with two merry
stars in their centres that a tear never had dimmed. He had short curly
hair, that made even his forehead look smiling and bright. He had a double
chin and very fat hands, and his arms fitted his jacket sleeves, and his legs
and trowsers like a tight glove well drawn on. He was not so tall as his
companion by a head, for Edward Austin was nearly six feet in beight and
finely proportioned. But Roundy Beebe made up in weight what he came
short of in height, and compounded in flesh for want of length in bone.
He was not lying on his back like Austin, but in a posture that suited his
lazy habits better and at the same time insured his getting upon his feet
again without assistance, viz: upon his belly. His face protruded over the
water a little, and in his fat hand he held a fishing rod with a grass-hopper
at the other end. He amused himself attentively in watching Bruce's
anxiety
whenever a trout would leap out of the basket, and in suspending the
grass-hopper, which was alive, just so far above the water as to make it hop
upon the surface. Edward Austin had, at the extremity of his delicate line
a blue and scarlet fly, which he was skilfully playing in a black nook beneath
a gnarled root, near that upon which he was reclining, and as he lay with
his face a little turned to one side to overlook the spot, he was thus enabled
to repose his person and pursue his pastime at the same time. Roundy's
free and easy position was in humble imitation of his young master's more
luxurious attitude.
Thus they were grouped there, with the evening shadows darkening the
old wood, the setting sun sending level arrows of golden light through the
crevices in the glades on the western side, the dark water flowing by, the
distant white cataract tumbling over and over itself in foam, and looking,
through the dim trees and indistinct light like a huge white monster
playing and curvetting, and madly roaring as if to break from some
invisible
bonds and dash through the echoing forest.
`Well, Master Nedward!' ejaculated Roundy, after having succeeded in
drowning his grass-hopper in vainly trying to make him skip over the
surface
.
`Well, Roundy,' responded the young man in a familiar tone and with a
pleasant half-smile; at the same time he threw his fly with a negligent air
farther into the little pool in which he knew there was a fine trout lying
covert
.
`I'se made up my mind!'
`Well, let us hear what you've made of it!'
`It's my pinion,, 'tant no use tryin to make hoppergrasses dance on
the water if they an't got got no partners. They'll die dead and drown jist
coss they feels so lonesome. You see how this one did I'm takin off my
hook. Look at him! His legs is all skewered up under him, and his
whiskers
hangs down as meek and flimsy-flamsy as ever was!'
`I didn't know before, Roundy, that grass-hoppers had whiskers!'
observed
Austin with a smile; he raised himself a little on his elbow as
he spoke, and fixed his gaze with sudden earnestness upon his fly. As he
did so a large trout whose shining sides and speckled back could be
distinctly
seen beneath the surface, darted for the bait, and in his eagerness
sprung with it twice his length out of the water.
`You're fixed now, Beersheba,' said Roundy, in a quiet tone of exultation
as he eyed the captive in his struggles to escape. `If I had you there you
might have some chance o' seeing your parents again, but when Master
Nedward is t'other end o' the line then you may jest as well make your will
and take it coolly!'
The young gentleman `played' his fiery and rapidly darting prisoner with
consummate skill and in a few moments drew him to the bank exhausted.
`I told you so, my child,' said Roundy, as he raised himself from his belly
to his knees, and began to disengage the trout from the hook; `I know'd
you'd have to guv in and say die! Get out, Bruce! Your eyes sparkled as
if you enjoyed the sport too! I wonder if Bruce couldn't angre, Master
Ned, if so be as I could larn him to hold a rod slantendiklar. He's been a
troutin' with us so much I'll bet a sojer agen an Injun chief he'd fish like a
gentleman!'
`You have my consent to teach him,' said Edward as he began to fold up
and arrange his tackle; `but not to-night.'
`He's knowing, brother Bruce is! but then I think sometimes he han't
got common sense.'
`Indeed?'
`Darn me if I think there an't some humbug about him arter all, 'telligent
as he'd make me b'lieve he was. Now did you see him watching them
trout? Why he looked as tarnal skeered whenever one on 'em would jump
as if 'twas a nest o' live hawks he was a guardin' and he expected they was
a goin' to fly away. He'd watch 'em out o' his eyes when they'd hop a foot
high jist as if he expected they was goin' right up through the trees into the
sky and say `I'm off!' Now if he's a dog so sensible as he pretends he is,
he'd know a fish couldn't fly, and that his watchin' that are basket was all
glum jist likejist like varnishin' sassengers. Now I dare say he thinks
them fish has wings or legs, and if they git on the ground they'll streak it
like a rabbit. Now for a dog what's reasonable and common-sense like on
other things to be such a idiot about trout when he's been a fishin' as much
as he has and knows their natur, dumsquizzles me.'
`Dum
what?
'
`Dumsquizzles me!' repeated Roundy with greater emphasis.
`Yes I understand.'
`To be sure you do. Dumsquizzles me it does, Master Ned?'
`Don't believe thus of old Bruce, Roundy. He only amuses himself with
a gambols of the fish. You mistook the expression of his eye.'
`No I didn't. I can tell his feelins jist as well as I can yours, Master
Nedward
.
His face is all over talk and readin' jist like a book. Why, I've laid
on my belly on the grass, and Bruce layin' opposite me with his nose on his
paws, and I've talked and gossipped with him by the hour, and I could
understand
him jist as if he had a spoke human words. There, he's listenin'
and understands every thing I say jist as well as you do. Now that's what
spifflicates me.'
`Does what?' asked Austin, with a sly, mischievous smile; for he
delighted
to banter Roundy upon his peculiar and favorite modes of expression.
`Spifflicate is a dictionary word, Master Ned,' answered the fat young
man a little touched.
`Is it? Oh, aye!
`To be sure it is. I never uses a word I doesn't know what it means,
Master Ned!'
At this moment as Austin was about getting upon his feet to return
homeward
,
they heard a rustling in the path behind them, and looking up beheld
a young man approaching with a fowling piece in his hand, and a game bag
and pouch slung beneath his arm. He had a handsome and prepossessing
countenanee, but it bore the marks, not to be mistaken, of incipient
dissipation
.
`Ah, Ned, my fine fellow, so you are just pulling up your traps and
starting
home!' he exclaimed in a lively tone. `What luck? Ah, I needn't ask.
A basket full of fine fish! I think I shall have to turn trout-killer, for I
can't find game. I have shot only two birds, one a plover and the other a
meadow-lark. I saw a rabbit and two grey-squirrels, but I couldn't get a
shot at them. I should like trouting but for the water. It don't agree with
me standing over the water. It always gives me the ague.'
`Perhaps, Master Ralph,' said Roundy with a sly twinkle in his blue eyes,'
perhaps you'd like fishing in the Brandywine creek.'
`Oh, you are there are you, you fat rogue!' exclaimed Ralph Waldron,
lifting his gun in a playful manner, yet slightly coloring. `But that reminds
me,' he said, taking a flask from his pocket. `I'm tired and knocked up
browsing about all the afternoon, and now I've met you I mean to take a
pull at my flask here, Austin. Come join me, and you, Roundy, shall have
a mouthful though you don't deserve it, you are such a fat reprobate. Here
Austin, here's a little silver cup I had made expressly to drink out of it. It
holds just a wine-glass full. Come, `he added, filling the cup from his flask
with pure brandy, `try a little. You have been fishing here I dare say this
three hours, and it's dry work as gunning, if it is in the water.' And he
presented the sparkling silver goblet to his friend.
`Thank you, no!' quietly answered Austin, `I never drink.'
`No, I know you don't, Ned,' replied Waldron with a smile of ready
acknowledgment
;
`but then a little won't hurt you. I always take a
thimblefull
when I've been out exerting myself and I never feel fatigue. There is
a sort of supernatural strength in a little brandy. Let me be ever so fagged
out, two swallows makes me a man again! Come, Ned,' and the young
man, whose strength lay in brandy, placed the cup upon the thumb and
finger of his friend, as if he would press it insinuatingly within his grasp.
`Excuse me, Ralph,' answered Austin firmly and looking a little annoyed,
while a slight expression of mingled pity and contempt passed over his fine
features, as he looked in the face of his friend and saw there the lines of
intemperance
faint, indeed, yet as decided and endurable as if cut in marble.
The young gunner looked hurt, and slowly withdrawing his hand he fixed
his eyes on Roundy, who was very busily occupied in winding up the last
line. `Well, I won't force you, Austin. If you choose to refuse a friend
you are at liberty to do so. But it's dull work drinking alone. A fellow
looks foolish pouring a glass down his own throat, while others stand around
lookin' on. Come, Roundy, you must drink with me. I dare say you
never
refused a good offer. I'll empty the cup and fill for you!' Thus
speaking
he placed the brilliantly colored `fire-blood' to his lips and was about to
empty the cup when Roundy answered with a very serious air, copying in
his reply the precise words of his master, `excuse me, Mister Ralph, I
never
drink!'
`Why man your cheeks are as rosy as two goblets of port. You mean
you never drink water!' And Waldron laughed, but in a way that showed
he did not believe what he said.
`No, Mister Ralph. I never drinked a bit o' liquor in my life, I nor
Master Ned never did. When he takes to drinkin' then I will, not afore.
Drunk or sober I'm Master Nedward's shadow, and hope I al'ays shall be.
But its drunk you never'll see this here shadow, I know that, Mister Ralph.
So I'm werry especially 'bliged to you, and thanks you jist as much as tho'
I was layin' down there in that bog puddle tipsy as a toper. When Master
Ned crooks his elbow then I'll begin to shoot the stars with a tumbler
turned
bottom-up! Like master, like man!'
`You talk, Roundy, as if there was great harm in taking a drop now and
then. Now it does one good. It makes a tired man feel like a new man.
Well, if I must drink alone I must. I'm not ashamed of it for I don't think
there is the least harm in it! So Austin here's your health, and Roundy, my
fatty, may your shadow never be less!
`I don't mean it shall,' answered the young farmer very drily; for the
position
his master had taken he resolved to imitate to the utmost; he being in
all things, as he truly termed himself, his master's shadow and admiring
imitator. `If I looked at the stars often in the day time, Mister Ralph, I
should no longer rejoice in fat and folly!'
`Well, I will drink your healths and mine too, for I'm fairly used up. I've
walked full three miles. In five minutes I shall feel as if I never knew
fatigue
.
You don't know what you lose!'
`Stay, Ralph,' said Austin, placing his hand upon his wrist as he was
about to drink. `You say it gives you strength. Let us see if this is true.
A year ago, before you had ever touched spirit, you and I leaped the stream
just above there from rock to rock. We were both equal in strength and
vigor and activity. `Come now,' added Edward, with a frank, kindly smile,
taking his arm,' come, and before you drink that let us try and see if we can
both leap it now. If drinking brandy has strengthened you, as you say, you
ought to be able to out-do me now.'
Waldron colored with sudden embarrassment, and then said in a
hesitating
manner, and with looks that were somewhat abashed, `I, I meant
after
I had taken a little! I will drink this, and in five minutes I will make the
trial with you,' he answered confidently.
`No. Try it now. If brandy has done you good you can now prove its
benefits. By all odds, as I have drank none you ought to be my superior.
Come Ralph, let us try!'
`But I have walked so far.'
`Three miles. I have walked no less than seven since dinner. I have
been to the head of the stream and back.'
`Yes, as I can bear witness to; for I sweat away at least five pounds of
good meat on the way,' answered Roundy.
`Now if you had taken a flask with you, Roundy, you would not have
sweat so. But I must drink before I try.'
`Then you acknowledge that you cannot leap so well now as a year ago.
Your brandy has done you an injury, Ralph, by your own admission.'
`Not a bit! I will try; but on condition that if I fail you will give me
another
trial after I nave taken a pull.'
`Agreed!' cheerfully answered his friend. They approached the spot.
The space was fifteen feet wide. Austin took the leap boldly and cleared
the stream with full two feet to spare beyond the verge. Ralph eyed the
chasm and the swift water with a timid, doubtful aspect. He made three
several demonstrations, and then turned away, saying with a look of
mortification
,
`I don't feel quite wellhead-ache. My sight swims a little. I give it up
on this score, Austin. But let me try my brandy now, and I will prove to
you the difference. I will show you that drinking does no harm, especially
what little I take; for I never drink except I'm gunning.'
`Which is every blessed day,' said Roundy in an under tone.
He took off the brandy, and immediately half-filling the cup again with a
quick furtive action, with his back half turned towards them, he drank this
off also, looking like a man who had no confidence in his natural powers.
`Now I am ready,' he said in a loud confident tone. `Come, my boy, let
me have that little matter tried over again. I feel well. My head-ache has
gone to the winds. Come, I'll show you, that though I felt a little bad just
now, I am as good as I ever was.' This was spoken with that feeling of
bravado which tries to outbrave shame.
He stepped back, started, and run the three yards which was allowed to
both, and then stopped short on the brink.
`I don't feel the brandy working yet. I'll wait a minute or so, Ned!' he
said with a laugh by which he would conceal his consciousness of physical
inferiority; for he felt in his heart that brandy had been the foe to his strength
and manhood. He paced the green a few times, and more than once
involuntarily
placed his eye upon the flask which lay with his gun and game
bag upon the ground, with a longing desire to deepen his draughts; but a
sense of shame or pride, whatever be the name of the sentiment, deterred
him. After a few moments he again took his post, and with that bold and
confident air which wine gives, he started for the leap. He threw all his
strength and skill into the act, and his feet left the bank with a free spring.
But the impetus was insufficient to carry him across, and coming short of
the opposite bank he plunged into the deep and rapid flood. He would have
been carried down but for the arm of Austin, who reaching out from the
shore seized him and brought him to land.
`Now, my friend,' said Edward kindly, `I trust you will confess the
impotency
of brandy to give a man strength. Believe me, it is his weakness!
This I trust you are now convinced of, and will, like a man, dash the
treacherous
thing forever from your lips!'
`It is because I was such a fool as to take
too
little,' answered Waldron
doggedly. `If I had not cared for you and taken what I wanted too, I would
have beaten you in the leap, instead of jumping into the stream as I have
done. I owe it all to you.'
`Why to me?' asked Austin with surprise.
`Because youyouthat is, I hate to drink even as much as would fill a
percussion-cap before such fellows as you, who look on as if it was
damnation
I was drinking. I don't like to drink before folks with such
confounded
ideas! There's no harm in it in the world. I never was drunk in my
life, and never intend to be! No man despises a sot more heartily than I
do. Never fear me, Austin. I shall drink a glass of wine or brandy when
I want it, and I shall be never the worse for it! I must take something now
or I shall catch my death of cold
Thus speaking he crossed the stream by a fallen tree a few yards above
and hurrying, he applied his flask to his mouth with a gusto that caused his
temperate friend to sigh heavily, and in imitation of which a grotesque groan
came audibly from the chest of Roundy Beebe.
CHAPTER II.
The
two young men taking up their fishing and hunting instruments, and
followed by Roundy Beebe, who in walking rolled like a man-o'war's-man
from very obesity, walked on a little while in silence. The path led along
the brook, and then leaving it crossed the larger stream beyond by a rustic
bridge. At the other side of the bridge were two paths, one leading by the
edge of the meadow round to the villages, the other crossing the intervale
in the direction of the villa visible above the woodlands.
`Here we separate, Ralph,' said Edward, `unless you will come home
and take tea with me.'
`Thank you, Austin. But I believe I'll go home. I leave for New York
to-morrow afternoon you know, and I have got things to attend to.
`Do you go so soon?'
`Yes. I received a letter yesterday from my uncle, in which he said he
would like to have me come to the city as soon as convenient, as he wished
to leave as soon after I came as possible.'
`You are going into partnership with him, Waldron?'
`Yes. I was his clerk you know until I was twenty-one, when I came
home to study law, for which I always had a fancy. But two years study
has shown me that it is not so desirable a profession after all. So as my
Uncle Ward wanted a partner, I wrote to him telling him I intended to
relinquish
the law and return to business, and proposed to go in with him.
The reply was he would like nobody better.'
`This was certainly very creditable to you,' answered Austin.
`Yes. Mr. Ward is a thorough merchant and a man of business. He
was satisfied with me when I was with him. He could not help being so,
for I devoted every hour and all my energies to his interests.'
Austin was silent and thoughtful. At length he said sadly, `Your uncle,
Mr. Ward has not seen you within a year or two has he?'
Waldron glanced at his face with a quick eye of suspicion; for his
conscience
could not fail to help him in understanding the motive which led
his friend to ask this question, and in a tone so sorrowful. He would have
replied to him in a quick and angry manner; but he thought it best not to
seem to have understood.
`No. It is two years since I saw him,' he answered with an embarrassed
air in spite of his forced indifference.
`I trust you will find it pleasant in New York, and that your business
connection
with Mr. Ward will prove as agreeable as formerly.'
`I have no fears. I understand you, Ned,' he said with a laugh. `You
think I shall take a little something now and then. You see I comprehend
your thoughts. But never fear for me. I only take a little when I am
hunting
,
or such like. As soon as I get to the city, I shall stop with it. Yes, I
intend to put my foot down and say
done!
I can leave it off when I choose.
I shall be as steady as a judge in the city. Business men can't drink and be
good for anything. I pride myself on my business habits. Never fear me
Ned. A drop out of a flask when one is out a gunning isn't drinking at
bars. That I never did. I never drank at a bar in my life.'
`I am glad to hear it. It is bad enough to drink, Ralph; but when a
young man drinks openly at bars he shews by the act that he is so far gone
in intemperance as to be lost to all sense of shame; that his mind is
stolid
to the lynx-eyed penetration and unerring judgment of public opinion. As
a friend let me urge you to abandon this practice at once. It will
insensibly
fasten upon you. You cannot throw it off at will. If you could have
done so, why not have done so but now? I fear me, Ralph, your are
farther
committed to intemperance than you will admit, or than you suspect.
The man who drinks alone and in private as you say you do, is the last to
discover his own infamy. He walks in a mist, and thinks himself and his
acts invisible. He believes not, suspects not, that men regard him as an
intemperate
man. He truly believes that his breath is not noticed by those he
talks with. He deludes himself with the idea that his thick tongue, his
unsteady gait, his garrulity and false hilarity are unnoticed. Because he tries
to blind himself to what he feels is becoming a habit, and succeeds in doing
so, he thinks that he has been as successful in blinding others. Now, my
dear Ralph, take the advice of a friend from boyhood, and resolve not to
become a slave to an appetite that is sure to bring infamy upon you. Now
my dear Ralph, take the advice of a friend from boyhood, and resolve not to
become a slave to an appetite that is sure to bring infamy upon you. Now
few, very few know that you drink. You have followed it but a year. It is
growing upon you. Three months ago you would not have drank before
me as you have done to day. This insensibility to my opinion alarms me
for you! You are going into the way of greater temptation. I beg you
strengthen yourself at once against it, for each hour will weaken your
power
to do so. Before you all is bright and promising. Do be entreated, my
dear friend, to give it up at once and forever!'
Austin spoke with the warmth of a sincere friend, and with touching
eloquence
.
Waldron's countenance had undergone various changes during
his appeal to him; but he now replied with a light laugh
`You are too serious altogether, Ned! I know the evils of intemperance
as well as you do. I should despise myself if I was an habitually
intemperate
man. What little I drink never effects me in the least.'
`You said that it makes you strong.'
`So it does!'
`This is an effect. It will lead to more evil ones. This artificial strength
as weakness under a mask. This continual tension of the cord destroys at
last its elasticity.'
`Well, well, my dear Ned, you are no doubt thinking you are speaking for
my good. I ought to be angry with you; for you talk to me as if I was a
regular toper. You had best take orders, for you seem well fitted to preach.
Did you never drink in your life?
`No.'
`Not a glass of wine?'
`Not one.'
`Don't you know the taste of brandy or any spirit?'
`I do not.'
`It seems incredible.'
`Why should it? Did you drink until the last year?'
`No, not spirits, that is true. But then my father you know always had
wine at table, and I always was accustomed to it from a boy with dinner.
Father you know is a gentleman of the old school; takes his glass of wine
when he sees fit and loves a bowl of punch on Christmas eve.'
`My father never had wine on the table while he lived; and my mother
has educated me in the habits of the strictest temperance. A glass of cold
spring water, Ralph, is more refreshing to my palate than could be the
richest
wines of Spain. It strengthens me too. It gives me a clear head and cool
blood. I should fear to touch wine lest it should vitiate that exquisite taste
given me by nature, by which a draught of pure water is rendered so
delicious
.'
`Yes, mister Ralph, said Roundy with zeal; `I'd rayther have a pull at a
gallon bucket o' molasses and water in a summer's day when I'm sweaty
than at all the Champaigny and Derrymysherry as was ever uncorked.'
Both of the young men laughed at the sally of Roundy, and shaking hands
in a friendly manner they parted, Edward saying that he should probably
go to New York also in two or three weeks to go into business.
`That ar' young gen'leman, Master Nedward,' said Roundy, after they had
walked on a little ways together,' seems to me to be fairly on the broad road
to ruination. I'm beflambygusted, if I didn't see a young pimple seed a
takin'
root on the eend o' his nose. Then the little fine red veins like scarlet
thread as looks as if thar was brandy in 'em, is beginning to sprangle on
his cheeks. If he han't been takin' to liquor ony a year he's got ahead
pretty fast.'
`It's a pity, Roundy, a great pity. I've seen it growing upon him for some
time. It is only lately he has openly carried a flask with him. It is a great
pity and I fear the worst after he arrives in New York where he will be
daily tempted. He has six thousand dollars to put in with his uncle, and it
he was steady he might become a rich and useful man.'
`It's nat'ral he should like it, master. He learned to taste the critter out
o' cut glass bottles at his father's table. It he becomes a drunkard his
father
may thank himself.'
`Mr. Waldron is a gentleman who has been a high liver, though never an
intemperate man. In giving Ralph wine he never supposed he was
creating
a taste which in manhood would crave stronger stimulant. Children
may love wine only, but when they become men and women they will have
alcohol.'
`Thank my father and mother!' ejaculated Roundy with a congratulatory
sigh; `thank 'em for not bringing me up to love champaigne at dinner. If
I'm a temperate man, Master Ned, I owe it to my broughten up and your
good example!'
`Yon had, it is true, little temptation to rich wines at your father's
humble
table, Roundy,' said Edward, smiling. `I can join with you in saying
that I owe much to my parents also for my love of temperance. I can
remember
how my father, heaven bless his memory! inculcated upon my
mind a disgust for drunkenness. He came into the house one day when
we lived in the city and taking me by the hand said, `Edward come with
me a moment.' He led me out the back-way into a lane in which was a
tippling shop. He conducted me to a spot where lay a' man on his back
half in the gutter half on the side walk. His clothes were in rags and
covered
with filth. His face was a scarlet black hue bloated hideously and
turned upward towards the hot sun. His mouth hung half open and the
saliva dribbled and puled down his cheeks upon his collar in a manner
disgusting
to behold. He was wholly incapable of helping himself and lay
there with a dull idiotic laugh upon his marred visage, trying to sing
snatches
of vile songs with drawling, broken words, intermingled with drunken
oaths so thickly articulated that I could hardly understand them. While I
was looking at him with horror and disgust, a monstrous hog came rooting
along and seeing him obstructing his way began to smell over him with his
snout. When the drunkard saw him he stared at the brute with a
half-conscious
look and began to talk or rather to try to talk to it and expostulate
with it for disturbing him. The hog, however, kept on smelling round him
and then began to thrust his snout beneath him, under his back, as if to
move him out of the way. But a fearful shriek from the drunkard showed
that it was with other intention. The wretches hand, the fingers of which
he had cut by falling on broken glass as he was kicked out of the shop where
he had been made drunk, lay under him, and the brute smelling the blood
had rooted under his back and seized it with his jaws. My father with
difficulty
caused the fierce and blood-tasting brute to release his hold, which he
did taking off with his savage teeth half of the drunken man's hand. I
never saw such a fearful sightso fearful yet so horribly revolting. The
man was taken to the hospital, but died from madness induced by the bite.
Since then I have had a horror of every thing like drinking. Besides,
Roundy
,
such terrible effects as these, it is sinful in the sight of God to brutalize
ourselves and cloud our intellects. No drunkard, says the word of Truth,
no drunkard shall inherit the kingdom of God. It not only degrades us
here, but destroys us body and soul forever. Poor Ralph!' He placed his
hand upon his heart and sighed deeply.
`Poor, poor Ralph!' groaned Roundy, laying his hand solemnly upon his
stomach.
They now came near the house. It was an imposing mansion situated
upon a sloping lawn and half hid in a grove of noble oaks, elins and
chestnuts
.
Upon the portico stood a middle-aged lady with traces of great
beauty
in her countenance and the still elegant
tournure
of her figure. She was
the mother of Edward Austin, a widow left with a good estate and this
only
son to inherit it. By her side stood a young lady of nineteen summers,
for from her sunny looks all her years seemed to have been summers. She
was rather small in figure yet exquisitely graceful, with a fair and brilliant
complexion, in which were blent the most delicate tints of rosy health. Her
profile was faultless; no Grecian chisel ever fashioned one so purely
classical
.
Her motions were like those of a happy bird and each movement
was an artless display of natural grace that enchanted, bewildered, and took
captive first the eye and then the heart. When in repose her countenance
had a pensive cast, and her deep blue eyes were sad and drooping as if tears
hung upon the lids invisibly. At such moments, perhaps, she was most
lovely
.
But when she was animated her eyes were full of dancing smiles, and
a chorus of wild Cupids were heard in the tones of her joyous laughter.
Add to this a sweet voice full of all the tones of music, a gentle and loving
heart, a cultivated mind balanced by good sense, and a small white hand of
which she was very proud and ought to have been so, for it was a
charming
toy for a lover to play with, (and she had a lover!) and a bewitching
little
foot that seemed made expressly for waltzing and not for walking, and
the portrait of Anne Laurens is complete.
`You are a loiterer to night, Sir Angler,' said this maiden as Edward
approached
the steps; for she remained upon them to receive him demurely
by the side of his mother, although if she had obeyed her heart, she would
have flown to meet him when he first came in sight. As she spoke, a soft
rich color deepened the pure tone of her complexion, and the lids of her
conscious eyes fell, half concealing their expression, as if she feared she
should betray too much of her heart in them.
`Yes, Anne,' answered the young man modulating his voice into a cadence
of singular delicacy and tenderness, that spoke to the bystander a volume
of love between them; for need we say that Edward was her lover to whom
we have alluded? The week before they had plighted troth. Anne was a
sort of cousin to Edwardthat, is, she was the daughter of a second cousin
of his mother! a remote relationship, but one which the young man
resolved
,
when he first saw her, he would spare no pains to make amends for
by making her his wife it he could teach her to love him! Teach her?
Anne needed no tutor other than young master Cupid; for she fell
irrevocably
in love with her handsome fourth cousin, while he was so busily
letting
himself fall in love with her. Anne's father was a merchant in Pearl
street, in New York, and a man of wealth; and as he was the executor of
the estate of which Edward was the heir, he was under the necessity from
time to time of visiting Mrs. Austin. The last time he came, which was
about four weeks before our story commences he brought Anne with him;
and at Mrs. Austin's earnest solicitation left her to make a visit of a month.
This month the cousins had made the most of in bringing their little affair
to a crisis, and before it was three quarters out they had come to a very
satisfactory
understanding with each other. At first they resolved to keep it a
secret from every body till Edward, who was about to establish himself in
business in the city, should be settled; but eyes, lovers' eyes in particular,
are arrant tell-tales. They could not look at each other without letting
every
body see that they loved one another. So Mrs. Austin was not long
mystified, and when Roundy roundly accused `Master Nedward' of being
`dead smit' with Miss Anny, Master Edward saw it was useless any longer
to keep a bird concealed in a glass cage, and he made a frank confession to
his mother of the true state of affairs, and was made happy by receiving
her sanction.
`Yes, Anne,' said Edward, `I have not had much success to day. It is
because you were not with me to select and fix my flies.'
`That's it, Master Nedward,' exclaimed Roundy, `Didn't I see how fast
you cotch'd the trout when Miss Anny baited the hooks. Lor! the fishes
seemed to fight for the pleasure o' being caught with the flies what she put
on. It shows their taste!'
`Roundy, how can I ever repay you?' cried Miss Laurens, laughing.
`What shall I ever say to such a perfect compliment?'
`Say to Master Nedward, (coz he'll do anything
you
say! (say he must
take me to York with him when he goes.'
At this request all laughed very heartily except Roundy, who looked
perfectly
grave aed serious.
`Why, Roundy, they'd put you in the Museum and advertise you as `the
fat gentleman,' said Anne.
`And I should have to keep an omnibus for you to move about in,
Roundy
,'
said Edward.
`I could be of service to you though, Master Nedward. I've stuck to you
through life since you dived into the trout pool and saved me from
drownin'
,
and as you saved me you've got to keep me with you. You know I axes
no wages, ony the love of waitin' on you. Who'd brush your coat I warn't
to know? or your shoes? or go your arrands? or call you in the mornin'?
or keep you company when you fished? or' Here Roundy burst out
a crying and couldn't proceed for his sobs.'
`Well, Roundy, as you are anxious to go with me, I will take you,'
answered
Edward. `I have been thinking of it before this; for I knew you
would hardly consent to part with me.'
`I may go with you?' eagerly demanded Roundy, brightening up and
smiling through his tears.
`Yes.'
`Oh be joyful, Nicodemus!' he cried, leaping up and dancing round after
the fashion of a waltzing elephant. `I'm goin' to York with Master
Nedward
!
Get out de way Ole Dan Tucker,
You're too late to come to supper!'
`Why, Roundy, you're beside yourself.'
`No, Master Nedward, I'm beside you, and mean to be beside you as long
as I live. You've made me happy. Hurray! hurray! out o' the way old
Bruce, and don't look so as if you thought I was makin' a fool o' myself. I
don't watch trout in a basket as if they had wings and would fly off through
the woods! I'm going to York and you are goin' to stay at homethat's
the news and put it in your eye and cry.'
`Edward, Roundy must have been drinking,' said Mrs. Austin, as he went
skipping off towards the kitchen, followed by Bruce, to make known his
good fortune to the servants.
`No, The poor honest fellow is only intoxicated with joy. I am glad he
is so easily pleased. I shall find him serviceable in the city, I dare say!'
`I can't bear to her you speak of leaving, my son,' said Mrs. Austin.
`It is quite time I should be in active business. I have been a year and a
half from college doing nothing.
`Nothing? You have given me your society and in a thousand ways
contributed
to my happiness. Is this nothing. You have been pursuing a
thorough
and useful course of reading. You have acquired the German and
Italian, and elegantly ornamented the rooms with handsome oil and water
color paintings from your own pencil? Is this nothing, my son?'
`I feel that I ought to have done more. But I am content, dear mother,
if you are! I am reconciled to it in the feeling that if I had perchance
not
have been an idler at home, I should
not
have been the proud and happy
possessor of this sweet hand!' As he spoke he took the hand of Miss
Laurens
and pressed it to his lips with passionate devotion. They then entered
the dwelling and after passing the evening in social conversation, varied by
the music of the piano and guitar, Edward playing the first while Anne
sang with the latter. Mrs. Austin assembled the household, opened the
family Bible and read a chapter, a sentiment or two in which, after it was
ended, led to a grave and pleasing discussion between Edward and his
mother. A beautiful hymn was then sung, in which all joined, including
Roundy, who was no mean vocalist. The clear manly voice of Edward,
mingling with the rich tones of the maiden, rising above yet blending with
the mellow notes of the mother, created a flow of divine harmony
singularly
appropriate to the hour and the occasion. The hymn being
concluded
all humbly knelt down, and Edward, with his prayer-book before him,
offered up devoutly that excellent and comprehensive prayer composed for
evening worship in families; a prayer that embraces all we need ask, whose
petitions cover all our wants.
CHAPTER III.
We
have, in the preceding chapter shown our hero surrounded with the
happiness of `home.' We have witnessed the manly integrity and virtuous
firmness of his moral character, in his interview with Ralph Waldron; the
kindness and affability of his nature in his unreserved intercourse with
Roundy; the excellency of his character as a son; the purity of his
devotion
as a lover. We have seen him honored and loved, and the centre of the
hopes of two beings, the dearest to him upon earth. We have borne
testimony
to his high principles as a man; and the temperance, truth and sound
judgement he has manifested, have irresistably commanded our respect, and
created in our breasts a strong and sincere interest in his future career.
Towards Waldron, his companion from boyhood to manhood, a young man
of equal social rank, of equal education, wealth and advantages, our
sentiments
have instinctively been of an opposite description. Instead of
commanding
our esteem, he has inspired in us emotions of dislike. Yet two
years, nay a much shorter period, before he would equally have challenged
our regard and enlisted our interest. He had been, from his eighteenth up
to his twenty-first year, the confidential clerk of his relative, Mr. Ward, a
distinguished merchant in New York. He had gone with him, after he had
graduated at that early age, at the request of his father, who desired him to
become a merchant. As he had stated to Edward, he had assiduously
devoted
himself to his business, and won the confidence of his uncle. But
being ambitious of political distinction, to which he saw that the bar was
the chief avenue, on arriving at maturity he left his uncle, returned to his
native place, a beautiful seat situated half a mile below that of Mrs. Austin,
and entered upon the study of the law with that assiduity which had
characterised
him in his mercantile pursuit. Edward being at this time at
home with his mother, their youthful intimacy was renewed, and
Waldron
was then worthy of the friendship of his noble friend. But this
intimacy was destined soon to be impaired, and finally to terminate. Ralph
had hitherto never freely indulged in the rich wines which it was his father's
habit to have daily upon his table. He was temperate in the midst of
temtation
.
But one day a fashionable young gentlemen from New York, a
cousin, came to pay him a visit of two or three days. This person's name
was Witt de Wittelsey, and he prided himself much upon his aristocratic
connections. He was exceedingly dissipated, and had nearly expended a
few thousands which had been left to him. Ralph, though he had seldom
associated
with him in New York, was gratified to see him, and they went
hunting
together, De Witt having brought a very fine blooded setter with him.
It chanced, that being fatigued with rambling the woods, they came to a
spring, at which Ralph proposed they should drink and refresh themselves.
`Water? Pah!' ejaculated the young
roue
. `I have something here,
Ralph, better than that,' and taking from his pocket the very flask Ralph had
afterwards shown to Edward, he shook it with a gratified air. `This is my
pocket pistol; I never go without it. One gets such detestable liquor in the
country, a fellow can't trust himself ten miles out of town without preparing
himself; come, Ralph, here is a bumper!'
`Is it wine?'
`No, pure Cogniac!' and he offered the brimming gobblet to the lips of
his friend.
`Thank you, De Witt; but I have never drunk any thing stronger than
wine.'
`Then you are a rare bird. Wine! pah! That will do for the women.
Men drink something stronger! come, try it. It won't hurt you. It is of
the color of ruby, and as smooth as olive oil. It was imported expressly for
a clique, and is confoundedly expensive; but then it is nectar! Come, I'll
set you the example; your health, Ralph!'
And the young man emptied the silver cup which formed a cap to the
flask, at a draught.
`Now try one; it puts life into a fellow! come!'
`I had rather not. If it was wine I should not object, though I drink wine
only at dinner.'
`If you are accustomed to drink wine, Waldron,' said Wittelsey,
determined
,
now that he saw his friend was a temperate man, to commit him to
intemperance, (for the drinker would have all drinkers,) `it won't harm you.
One glass of brandy is not worse than two of wine! It will do you more
good. Take it, or, by Jupiter, I shall feel hurt, and take it as a slight. It
looks as if you was condemning me for what I conceive there can be no
harm in!'
`Well, I will to oblige you, De Witt,' answered Ralph with hesitation;
and receiving the silver cup, he placed the draught to his lips; but finding
it too strong he would have declined it, but his friend carefully pouring a
part back into the flask filled it up with water from the cool spring,
degrading
God's free gift to the basest uses, and then the victim received it and
drank it off. De Witt eagerly watched his countenance.
`Is'nt it very fine? I am sure you will never drink flat wine after
having
tasted this?'
`It is certainly very pleasant.'
`I am surprised you never have drank brandy! I am proud in having
the honor, my dear boy, of initiating you. You see I would'nt have urged
you; but I knew how you would like it.'
It is too strong to be agreeable; I prefer wine.'
`You will soon get used to it; a mere tickle of the palate. To enjoy it,
you should take it pure. Water spoils it.'
The two young men proceeded homeward. Before they reached the
house a shower came suddenly up and wet them thoroughly. Water does
temperate folks no harm, but it is doubtless, dangerous to drunkards; for
Wittelsey gave the shower as an excuse for taking something inside.
Ralph having once drank was the more easily persuaded to repeat the
draught, especially as his friend assurred him, upon his honor, that unless
he did so he would catch cold. But Ralph had had many a severer
ducking
than that without any injurious effects, and yet he had taking nothing
to prevent them. De Witt's arguments were, however, irresistable. They
were, virtually, `we must either take a cold or take a drink. A drink is far
pleasanter, so let us take a drink. We can't take two things at once!
Waldron drank with him, and without water, his cousin contending that
they had quite enough of that fluid without, to put any in. So he drank
with him, that he might not take cold; for there is a wonderful plausibility
in the argument of a man who would tempt a temperate friend to drink;
and he who
listens
is too apt to see their plausibility, and finally to sacrifice
his own judgment and experience to the sophistry which seeks his
downfall
.
So Ralph listened, drank, `and became as one of them.' Would he
have yielded so easily if his father's wine cup had not gone before his
cousin's
goblet? From that day, during Wittelsey's visits, he constantly drank
with him; for he loved the taste, and the after effects of the brandy upon
2
his blood and brain. It inspired him with an exhilaration of spirits and
feeling, that was novel and delightful. It had upon him the effect, in some
sort, of opium, and he enjoyed the state of high excitement and animation,
which it induced. As this condition, however, passed away, with the
exhaustion
of the alcoholic virus, and left a corresponding flatulency of
feeling
,
and dullness of mind, attended with a strange, indescribable weight
upon
the thoughts, he sought to restore the pleasing state, and revise his
agreeable emotions by new draughts. Wittelsey had made him a present
of the flask, and had promised to send him a demijohn of the brandy; a
small one filled with his `nector,' being always carried by him in his trunk!
After he left, Waldron took his gun to go to the woods, his flask in his
pocket. He did not go so much to hunt, as to heat himself by exercise, and
induce that fatigue, which would render, as he knew by experience, a pull
at his brandy-flask, so refreshing and agreeable. After half an hour's walk,
he sat down, fatigued, beneath a tree, and filling his cup drank it full, and
with a sensible emotion of pleasure, that would have rejoiced the heart of
Wittelsey, and made heavy the soul of the philanthropist.
For a young man, first deliberately to fatigue himself to enhance the
enjoyment
of a draught of strong waters, and then retire to a secluded spot in
the forest to drink alone, merely for the false animation and fatal
exhiliration
he knew it would produce, was a strong proof that the habit of
intemperance
had fastened upon his life with the fangs of an adder. It had truly
became a habit, short as the time was in which he had formed it; for in four
days any habit may be formed and interwoven into the character of the
man, be the habit good or bad. Every person's experience will bear
testimony
to the truth of this assertion. The habit which Ralph had formed
while Wittelsey was with him, was irresistably confirmed upon him in his
absence; for he had said within himself, when he discovered he was liking
brandy, `I will drink it only while he is here, and with him; when he is
gone I shall abandon it!'
But resolutions that are not strong in the temperate hour, are not likely to
be after brandy has passed the lips; it takes a place within the man, and
pleads for itself. Out of the mouth the monster has no power; within it,
he is a subtle arguer on his own behalf; and strong in virtue and moral
power, must he be who can resist him, and stand in his integrity as he stood
before.
A second time Ralph emptied his silver cup, and then proceeded
homeward
.
As he was coming out of the wood, he beheld coming along the path,
with his rods and wires, Edward Austin. Suddenly he coloured, stopped
and looked around, as if he would have avoided the meeting. His looks
were confused and guilty. Already he began to be sensible of his
degradation
.
He was sensible he was considerably under the influence of what he
had taken. He stopped and asked himself if he were not steady enough in
step, and sober enough in countenance to meet his friend, without his
suspecting
any thing. He summoned all his self possession, and being
conscious
that his step was a little rambling, he affected a lameness to conceal
any disposition to stagger, for the path had been for some minutes a little
tremulous to his eyes, as he looked before him. Assuming then a bold,
confident air, and thrusting a peppermint under his tongue, (a secret taught
him by Wellesley to conceal the smell of spirits on his breath,) and limping
a little, supported by his gun, he encountered his friend, whom, before this,
he had never feared to meet eye to eye.
`Ah, Ralph, have you hurt yourself?' asked Edward kindly.
`Yesa little; it is a mere trifle. Going a fishing, my boy?' he continued
in a higher tone than was needful.
`Yes. But why have I not seen you of late?'
`Why, De Witt, you know, has been with me, and'
`But he has been gone a week!'
`Yes; fine fellow he is, Ned you should have cultivated his
acquaintance
.
You'd liked him!'
`I did not like him. He seemed a very dissipated and unprincipled
young man. His countenance showed intemperance in strong lines.'
`De Witt takes a littlea little, but he don't make a practice of it; oh
no! He's a d, d,I mean a
confounded
cleclever fellow! I did'nt mean,
to swear, oh no!'
Edward, by this time had discovered that his friend was under the
influence
of liquor, though trying to disguise it. His heavy, and yet restless eye,
his flushed cheeks, and slightly thick articulation, confirmed this condition.
He also inhaled the brandy-tainted air which he breathed. He was
transfixed
with surprise, and regarded him in silence, with mingled pity and
amazement. Waldron saw, and rightly interpreted his looks. He would
have said something to defend himself, but fearing he should betray his
condition
farther if he spoke, for he was a ware he had not the full control of
his words, he pretended to feel pain in his foot, and screwing up his
features
,
he said he must hurry home! From that time he avoided Edward's
company, from a dread of exposing his habit to him, and from an instinctive
feeling that he was not fit to associate with him. Drinkers like the society
only of their kind; for they reproach not one another for alcoholic breaths,
and have charity if a brother staggers, or utters his words thick. Edward,
after meeting him two or three times more, and each time detecting the
signs of indulgence, gradually withdrew from his society; and latterly when
they met it was usually with a cold bow, or a few indifferent words. In
the meanwhile the habit grew upon him. He neglected his studies, for
drinking kept him constantly in a restless condition of the mind, and
application
became impossible to him. He took to reading books that would
entertain
and divert him from himself, and when these failed he would drink
a glass of brandy and water. His habit he kept as secret as he could. He
never let any one see him drink; and being always careful to disguise his
breath, and to avoid society when at all overcome, he passed unsuspected,
except by those who, like Austin, were not deceived in the appearances
with which the wretched man, who finds his habit growing upon him,
vainly
and ingeniously strives to hide it from the world.
Finding that he could not apply himself to study, he determined to return
to business; and, conscious that his habit was becoming fixed, he hoped,
(all hope so at first!) that he would be able to break it off by change of
place and associations. He, therefore, opened a correspondence with his
uncle, and Mr. Ward being wholly ignorant of the alteration in his habits,
gladly embraced the opportunity of taking him in as a partner. Ralph had
a thousand dollars, a legacy from an aunt, and five thousand given him by
his father. This sum he intended to add to the capital. The day following
the interview with Edward by the trout stream, he accordingly departed by
stage for the metropolis.
Edward had also determined to embark his fortunes in the city. He had
at interest five thousand dollars, which with some other sums, amounted to
about six thousand dollars. The villa with the land which he would
inherit
on his mother's decease was worth about fifteen thousand dollars, though
it was still lying under a heavy mortgage, which had been existing since
his father's death. To lift this weight from his inheritance, and increase
his patrimony, he resolved to become a merchant. He had written Mr.
Laurens to this effect, and received in reply such encouragement as
determined
him to proceed to the city with as little delay as possible. Anne
Laurens left with her father a day or two after his return from his angling
with Roundy, while Edward promised to follow in a few days. Mr.
Laurens
had no suspicions that his daughter had lost her heart during the four
weeks he had left her with Mrs. Austin; although the knowledge of the
facts would have gratified him a little; for he was well acquainted with the
correct character and integrity of principle of Edward, and had more than
once thought over the prospect of a match between him and his daughter.
Perhaps, it was partly to favor this wish that he planned this visit to the
residence of Mrs. Austin.
They had driven but a little while along the road, after leaving the
grounds of Hart-Hall, when Mr. Laurens assuming a dry manner, but with
a slight twinkle in his eye, said
`Well, Anne, you have had a pleasant visit.'
`Yes, father.'
`Mrs. Austin is a fine woman.'
`Yes; I like her very much.'
Having thus answered, Annette trembled, turned pale, and then blushed
very deeply; for, thought she the next question will be about Edward.
And the next question
was
about Edward.
`You saw something of her son? A fine young man. How do you like
him?'
`Pretty well, sir!'
`Eh? only pretty well. Methinks he is a young gentlemen that might
make an impression upon young ladies' hearts. Only pretty well?'
`I think he is pleasant, sir!'
`That is better!'
`He is very agreeable at times.'
`Is he?'
`Quite so. He converses well.'
`Does!'
`I have hardly known a person who can render himself so agreeable.'
`No!'
`He is very handsome too!'
`Ah, ah!'
`And intelligent.'
`And any thing more?' inquired her father with a quizzical glance out of
the corner of his eye.
`He told me he loved me,' she replied, blushing yet laughing and
effecting
a bewitching simplicity.
`He did, ah?'
`Yes sir,' she answered demurely.
`And what did you reply, hey?'
`That I also loved him very much.'
`The devil you did!'
`Yes sir!'
`So you like him pretty well?'
`
Pretty
well, sir!'
`Ah, you minx, you have been making hay, I see! Well, you have
behaved
like a good girl. So he told you he loved you, and you told him so!
What more happened?'
`We promised to love each other till death, and be married as soon as
my dear papa would give his consent.'
`Very well put in. So you and Edward are engaged, Anne?' said he
seriously
.
`Yes father,' she answered in a faltering voice, her eyes drooping, and
sweet blushes mantling her cheeks.
`Then I am happy. I wished this very thing. Edward is a noble young
man, and will make you a good husband.'
Anne embraced her father with grateful affection, and her eye brightened
with pride and happiness.
`But you will have to be content with being lovers a while,' he said
gravely
.
`Edward has to get into business, and establish himself before he thinks
of marrying.'
`How long before it will be, do you think, dear father?' she asked
demurely
.
`A year!'
`A year? that is an age!' she said, clasping her hands together with
surprise
.
`Well, be a good girl and perhaps we may say six months,' he said
smiling
.
He received a kiss upon his cheek for this; and when he said it
might
be no more than three months, he was nearly smothered.
CHAPTER IV.
In
one of those handsome streets that diverge from Broadway, in the
vicinity of the Park, stands an edifice of an exterior somewhat imposing.
It was the aristocratic mansion of an old family now represented only by a
single persona young gentleman with whom the reader will become
acquainted
.
The house once stood alone in dignified exclusiveness, but blocks
of dwelling-houses were now closely joined to it on either side, amid which
it stood a grand old representative of the architectural luxury and elaborate
taste of the days anterior to the revolution when the wealthy colonists aped
royalty. It was three stories in height with a deep front, ornamented by a
row of pilasters, with ionic capitals and crowned by an architrave loaded
with ornamental carving. There was a row of lion's heads along the
entablature
,
and above each window upon an arch was a grotesque human
face. Over the massive and imposing door way was a coat of arms
supported
by griffin's claws and surmounted by a baronial coronet. The whole
facade of the house was of a dark brown colour to which in many places
time had added stains of inky black. Altogether this edifice was noble and
striking to the eye and spoke eloquently of the days of by-gone colonial
grandeur.
The full moon, an hour high, was shining in broad, clear radiance upon
its front, lighting up each detail of the architecture with the distinctness of
noonday, when two young men, who had been walking leisurely down the
side of the street which lay black in shadow, (half the street being buried
in the dark shadows of the opposite blocks of houses) stopped over against
it and looked carefully around them.
`There is no one coming down now! Let us cross over,' said De Witt
Wittelsey.
`I had rather wait till those people pass who are coming up!' replied
Ralph Waldron.
`They are only labourers or persons you need'nt care for!'
`It may be, possibly, men I employ in the store. I can't be too careful.
I would rather wait, Wittlesey and go in some other night when the streets
are darker!'
`It is confoundedly light to-night that is a fact!'
`A person entering any house, the opposite side of the way, could be
recognized from people who might be at their drawing-room windows on
this, as plain as in sun-light. As I go with you merely from curiosity,
another
night will do as well. I would'nt commit myself by being seen; for
you know I am a business man now!'
`True. But there is no danger! There, those men have got up by. Let
us dart quickly across the way and we shall be in before any one can
observe
us!'
Waldron glanced anxiously round at the curtained windows of the
houses
near him to see if any one was looking forth, and then taking his friend's
arm hurried across the street with him. They hastened their steps as they
emerged from the shadow that lay upon the half of the street into the
moonlight, on coming into which Ralph felt as if a cloak hitherto
concealing
him, had fallen from his person, exposing him to the observation of
every
eye; for he was conscious that he was about to enter the door of the
most fashionable and dangerous gambling house in the city; though its true
character was only suspected by the world. They reached the door when
De Witt grasping the massive knocker pulled at it as if at a bell handle
when the door as if by invisible means was thrown open and as suddenly
closed upon them. Waldron found himself in a neat vestibule, a small
porter's room between the door and the hall beyond. The only occupant
was a young man with very long light hair sweeping upon his shoulders in
a rich profusion of curls,a light coloured mustache and imperial, effeminate
blue eyes, a fair white complexion and a look of the most decided
profligacy
.
His hand which was fair and delicate was loaded with massive rings,
and a ponderous cameo set in massive gold adorned the fine linen folds of
his shirt bosom. He was dressed in the height of fashion with an eye-glass
attached to a fine-linked gold chain, a costly watch secured by a second
chain of gold being thrown round his neck and crossing his vest, which
was of blue silk spangled with stars in silver thread. He wore a gorgeous
Chinese dressing robe instead of a coat, and was seated at his ease upon
an arm chair with one foot elegantly booted stretched upon a little marble
table that stood before him. He was, altogether, externally, the
personification
of effeminate foppery. His air and attitude were in perfect keeping
with his appearance. But the expression of his countenance was in
remarkable
contrast with the gaiety of his attire. It was youthful and fair, but
upon every lineament was impressed the stamp of finished vice. There
was no crime that that young man would not seem to be ready to commit.
His was a countenance neither to be loved nor trusted.
`Ah, De Witt,' he said in a thin, violin-like voice, `You are here late!'
`It is but nine o'clock, Virril!' answered Whittelsey in an indifferent tone,
and with the air of a superior holding the person he answered in supreme
contempt. The young man accustomed to such treatment from the rich
and fashionable young gentlemen who resorted there, betrayed no other
feeling at his manner than by slightly compressing his sharp lips and
moving
the corners of his mouth with a scarcely perceptible sneer of hatred.
`Who have you with you? Does he wish to enter his name?'
`No. Merely a friend?'
`He will be trusted?'
`I should not have brought him unless I knew so,' replied Wittelsey
haughtily. `Open the door and let us into the hall!'
`You have not given the recognition! It is required of all who enter
whether known to me or not!'
`True!' and De Wttt drawing off his glove placed the fore finger of the
left hand upon a gold eagle that was fastened upon the centre of the little
marble table. Letting it rest there a moment he carried the finger to his
lips and then resumed his glove. Waldron saw all this with surprise.
`This is the sign of the initiated' answered Wittlesey laughing. `None
pass beyond that door who cannot give it, unless they enter with some one
of the club!'
The door-keeper then threw open the inner door and they entered a
spacious central hall panelled and ornamented with very elaborate
architecture
.
It was brilliantly lighted by a solar lamp placed upon a pedestal at
the foot of a broad flight of stairs with a massive balustrade. The doors
on each side of the hall were open and Waldron saw that the apartments
were elegantly furnished. Young men were assembled in one playing at
cards on polished tables lighted from above by suspended solar lamps, and
in the other, on the left hand was a large table covered with crimson velvet
and surrounded by a polished brass edge, around which several persons
were gathered playing at some game the name of which he was ignorant.
In the hall two or three young men were walking up and down and
smoking
.
All were fashionable in their dress, dissipated in their air; and
among
them Waldron recognized many of the `young bloods' of the town.
Ralph accompanied his guide through both of these rooms, lingering
around the tables to observe the players and watch their varied success.
`We will now go into the upper apartments,' said De Witt after they had
made the tour of these rooms, the luxury and magnificence of which
surpried
Ralph; while he was astonished to find such a concourse of young
men of the first families assembled here to play.
Ascending the broad stair-case which was brilliantly lighted, they came
to a second hall with doors leading into four apartments. There was but
one of the doors open through which they passed into an elegant billard
room where some half dozen young men were engaged at play, wearing
gay Turkish smoking caps, and white linen jackets. Every thing aroung
was luxurious and in perfect taste. There was neither disorder nor
rudeness
.
Ottomans about the room invited to voluptuous indulgence. The
floor was covered with a thick carpet that gave back no sound to the tread,
and the windows were richly curtained. Upon a marble stone at one end of
the room stood a silver salver with cigars upon it, for the use of the players.
There was no appearance of wines in the room, nor had Ralph seen any
below.
`There are three more doors leading from the hall; are these gaming
rooms also?' he enquired.
`Not all of them. One is a private chamber belonging to the young
gentleman, Frank Frankton, who keeps the establishment. You know that
he inherited this house with a handsome fortune which he soon ran through
with, and then mortgaging his house, he ran through with that. It all went
in play, of which he was passionately fond!'
`And how is it then that he dwells here and is proprietor of this splendid
establishment?' asked Ralph with surprise.
`I will tell you. He used to assemble his friends to play in his
prosperity
,
having two rooms fitted up for this purpose; the apartment below stairs
on the right where you saw them playing at brag, and this we are now in.
Here he lived as a bachelor in great luxury and expenditure; and here his
friends, and well-dressed black-legs whom he at times associated with on
account of their deep playing, won his money from him and ruined him.
Finding his situation desperate he resolved on converting his house into a
suit of magnificent club gaming saloons. You see what is! It has made
his fortune! Every player pays him a certain sum for the privilege of
playing
,
while each frequenter here subscribes yearly one hundred dollars.
His subscriptions amount to ten thousand dollars a year. He reserves to
himself also a certain per centage on all winning over a hundred dollars.
He does not play himself much, as his passion seems to find food in the
management of such an establishment!'
`Does he pay no tax to the city?'
`Not beyond the value of his property. The city are ignorant of its
character. It is supposed still to be a private house where Frankton as
formerly receives a good many friends to play and make merry. In fact it
is known a club meets here
occasionally!
Its true character is suspected but
by few!'
`Yet I have heard of its existence as a fashionable gambling house.'
`Yes, I know some people pretend more is carried on here than appears;
but the public have never had their attention drawn to it. Every thing, you
see is managed by a thorough system. Frankton is a perfect prince in his
way. You saw the caution with which we were admitted. No man can
enter here who is not a friend of some one of the club!'
`Your account surprises me! It is a magnificent affair, and I can well
conceive must attract all the rich young men in town!'
`You see here the very
elite
!' answered Wittlesey with a patronizing
look of ostentation.
`Was that the proprietor below?'
`Who?'
`The pale young man with the gold chains and rings who let us in?'
`He!' exclaimed De Witt with a tone of contempt, `Frank would little
thank you for that compliment. The fellow you saw there has been a
black-leg
of the first water. He is Frankton's door-keeper and his tool to do
whatever he chooses to command. I don't know why he employs such a
wretch. But there is some mystery in it which leads Frankton to retain
him about his person. He is vulgar and malicious. Why, the fellow can't
even read or write his own name. The only literature he knows any thing
about is contained within a pack of Crehore's cards. I said he could not
read. Yes, he can read private marks in cards, and so skilfully, that no
man will set down to a table with him, not even his own friends. So as
nobody would play with him, perhaps out of pity to keep the devil from
starving Frankton has taken him into his employ. He makes a good door
keeper, and so does a dog!'
Waldron smiled at this conclusion of De Witt's description of Virril.
They then together crossed the hall to a door which was closed. Waldron
thought he heard the clashing of steel within; and the door being thrown
open at a knock given by his companion, he found himself in an apartment
in which two young men, striped to their waists, were boxing with gloves,
and two others engaged in a spirited fencing bout, with foils. The room
was hung with boxing-gloves, caps, foils,small swords; and even spears and
sabres, formed a part of its garniture.
`This is the fencing chamber!' said Wittlesey. `You see Frankton has
every thing to please all tastes!'
`It surprises me that I find no drinking here. I have seen nothing like
wine in any of the rooms! Is it possible so gay a resort as this can be
governed
by temperance? Yet I am pretty confident some of the young bloods
I have seen here are a little elated!'
`Temperance does not exactly govern here, but it is regarded very
strictly
by Frankton, who will not allow any one to remain here after he becomes
at all excited or noisy with wine. This is a rule of the place and is never
set aside for any one. Tipsy people are noisy and cease to be respectable;
and Frankton will have every thing respectable and quiet as you see. Come
with me. There is one other room to enter!'
The young merchant yielded himself to his guidance and they stopped
before a door, which was partly open, and from which came sounds of
music
.
De Witt threw it wide and Waldron stood still transfixed with
astonishment
.
The room was large and grand in its height and breadth, and
seemed to be panelled with mirrors multiplying themselves a thousand
times to an infinite series of distances on all sides of the beholder.
Between
the mirrors were slender silver-gilt columns wreathed with vines and
flowers exquisitely wrought, and colored to the life. The ceiling was
exquisitely
painted with classic groups of figures, and from it was suspended
a gorgeous pyramid of crystal, blazing like the sun with a hundred lights.
The floor was polished and ornamented with stars and borders in mosaic,
the pieces being of colored wood. At one end of the magnificent room
was a raised plat-form laid with rich carpets and surrounded by seats
covered
with crimson piled velvet and presenting somewhat the appearance of
a private box at the theatre. In it were two beautiful girls not more than
eighteen stationed before a white marble slab which run across the
da's
like
a counter, upon which was displayed numerous decanters of sparkling
wines, and silver and cut-glass goblets in dazzling array. There were
beautiful
little chased vases containing some cigars, others gilded paper-lighters
for the smokers, and upon small silver plates were strewn the minute pellets
of
cachou aromatise
for diffusing an aromatic flavor in the mouth and
removing
the taste and smell caused by smoking and drinking. These young
girls were dressed in the most attractive manner, and used their smiles and
glances as lavishly as Don Cupid shoots arrows. They were engaged in
waiting upon several young men, handing them the fragrant cigars on the
vase, or gilded paper-lighters, or the little silver plates of aromatic pellets
with a grace, and air and wreathed smiles and bewildering glances that
were in themselves dangerous enough, without the drinking and gaming, to
ruin half the young men. Yet Waldron could see that they were but
automatons
,
beautiful animated automatons, giving to all and each who
approached
their tempting mart, the same charming smiles, the same fiery
glances! There were at least a dozen young men gathered around this
shrine of Bacchus, where Venus presided with such dangerous fascination,
the most of them with ruby goblets in their hands!
`I had no need' thought Ralph, `to ask if wine were kept here! There is
the crystal throne itself, of the sparkling god!'
Music filled the air around him, and he looked to discern whence it came,
but the source was invisible. It came in rich swells, a burst of
instrumental
sounds like the rising wind, and then lulling, was succeeded, in the calm
that followed, by the richest female voice Waldron had over listened to!
Even the groups about the marble counter of wines ceased their talk with
each other and suspended their gay speeches to the fair attendants, to listen.
`This is a wonderful place, Wittlesey,' said Ralph after the voice and the
instruments, mingling and commingling, had died away as if receding in the
infinite distance which the eye seemed to behold in the perspective of the
mirrors.
`I knew you would be gratified to visit it, or I should not have urged you,'
answered Wittlesey blandly. Come, my dear fellow what will you take?'
Wittelsey to do him justice blushed as he asked the question; for he knew
that Ralph had before refused him saying that now he was in business with
his uncle he was going to give up all spirits. This was true. Waldron had
been in the city now one month and during that time, although with great
difficulty, and hourly longing for his habitual draught, he had succeeded in
keeping temperate. But the struggle had been a painful, a severe one, and
for the first two weeks he thought he should have to yield to his habit.
Several times De Witt had sought his company, and in vain tempted him,
laughing at his temperance! Waldron, however, was naturally resolute and
strong-minded and remained firm with the strongest inclination to comply.
His resolution was a reproach and reproof upon the habits of De Witt, and
he felt it to be so. Therefore he secretly determined he would make him
break it. There was a deeper motive. Wittelsey was greatly embarrassed
for want of money, and he knew his cousin had six thousand dollars!
`If I can make him drunk I can make him play!' he said to himself, and a
truer saying was never uttered. He who drinks will playwillnay there
is nothing he may not be capable of doing; for reason is no longer at the helm
and the man is driven by every wind of temptation whither his tempter leads,
or his inflamed passions urge him onward. Wtttelsey reasoned well, and
from deep knowledge of human character. `
If I can make him drink I can
make him play
. If he
plays
I win his money!'
From that moment he ceased not to press his attentions upon Waldron
He began by taking him to the different libraries, the Historical rooms, and
other like places to lull suspicion and with the pretence of introducing him to
what was worth seeing and visiting, now that he intended to reside in town.
He then, gradually approaching the point, suggested a visit to the B*** Club.
`Merely a visit! just to drop in and see the place. It is truly a curiosity!
You ought not to miss the opportunity of seeing it. Go with me to-night!'
were the words of his tempter.
So Waldron consented and went with him as he desired. But he was not
a man of that pure and high order of morals which characterized Edward
Austin. Ralph was in some sense a man of the world, and saw no great harm
in fashionable amusements. He always liked the theatre, and had played
billards. He felt no compunction in visiting a gaming house out of
curiosity
,
provided he was not seen entering it. His only fault of character, he
believed, had been his drinking, and in conquering and subduing this he
feared
no danger from any other source. He, therefore, did not feel shocked at
the scenes he beheld here. They rather surprised but interested him.
Edward Austin, on the contrary, in the purity of his heart, and in the
uprightness
of his moral feelings would have shrunk from mingling in a scene
where the laws of manly virtue and moral excellence, which alone make a
man dignified and honorable, were suspended.
CHAPTER V.
Wittelsey
repeated his invitation to Waldron, to join with him in a
glass of the sparkling brandy that stood before them upon the marble table.
`I have positively resolved never to drink any more spirits while I am in
business.'
`You won't refuse wine! That I know you are accustomed to. Vestris!'
he cried, addressing one of the young girls, each of whom had a soubriquet,
borrowed from some popular danseuse, `the decanters and goblets! The
silver ones,' he said in a low tone. `We can drink more in them, as they
don't tell us how deep we go, like the glass. You will take wine with me,
Ralph?'
`I have no objections to wine, though I drink wine only at dinner.'
Wittelsey's eye sparkled as he filled his friend's glass, for he well knew
that he who will take one glass will take two,and he who will take two has.
by so much, weakened his resolution, and will be easily induced to take
another
;
and he who will drink three glasses of wine, will not be found
difficult
to tempt to brandy, especially if he has had once a love for it.
Wittelsey reasoned well, as the bad always do when they would tempt
the upright to fall. Ralph being accustomed to wine at his father's board,
thought no evil of it. He did not hesitate to indulge in it moderately.
Brandy was all he feared. He was ignorantly making a distinction without
a difference. For he who loves wine will come to love that which is
stronger
than wine. The habit of drinking wine insensibly deadens the
sensibility
of the taste and palate, and to excite them, three glasses become
necessary
,
where one will not produce the requisite sensation. But three or
four glasses, the wine-drinker finds will give head-aches and dullness, and
by and by, fail to produce the pleasant results they once did. To deepen
his draughts drowns his senses and besots him! His only alternative is to
substitute brandy for wines! This is a necessary and irresistable change.
He finds one glass of brandy produce the effects that formerly was caused
by a single glass of wine, and which now half a dozen glasses fail to bring
about. He therefore drinks brandy, moderately at first, and oddly enough
begins to think that, by the change, he has taken a great step towards
temperance
and moderation. But the one glass of brandy must of necessity, by
and by, become two, and two,
three
, till the senses become paralysed, the
eyes inflamed, the nerves unstrung, the hand trembling, and the whole man
lives by an artificial stimulant irregularly and wildly coursing through the
veins, arteries and nerves, in place of the pure fluids! feeding upon his very
life, while it communicates life, in it are the seeds of death!
If Ralph had never known wine, he would have been less easily tempted.
It was because he drank wine he was prevailed upon by De Witt in their
hunting excursion to try brandy. It was because he drank wine he now
consented to partake with him! He drank and then the two young men
turned away to walk up and down the room. At the farther extremity,
seated in a luxurious arm chair, of purple velvet, borded with gold lace, and
surrounded by three or four young men who were lounging upon ottomous
and smoking, sat a person whose appearance at once struck Waldron. He
was a man about seven and twenty, of great height, and symmetry of
person
,
and an exterior of the most polished refinement. He had a noble
head, covered with dark locks, and a profile whose outline was the
perfection
of manly beauty. His complexion was olive, and relieved by black
arched eye-brows, and large whiskers, coal black and glossy as a raven's
wing. His eyes were large, bold and penetrating, and his lips expressed
decision
and strength of character. But the expression of his face was
repulsive
.
It was cold, heartless, artificial. He looked like a man relentless in
hatred, and one who would arrive at whatever he aimed by any means
whatsoever. This, however, was the deeper expression of his countenance
and which he did not care should be read; and his habit was to conceal the
true malignity of his character beneath smiles, and gentle-toned words, and
an address of the most finished courtesy. Altogether he was a splendid
looking man of the world, whose appearance in any Court ni Europe would
be distinguished. He was in a sort of undress, being attired in a green silk
robe, and wearing a green velvet cap with a gold braid and tassel. He was
smoking a Turkish pipe, ornamented with chains of gold, and the fragrant
perfume of the scented scarfalatti tobacco which he gracefully expelled from
his lips, as he reclined in his luxurious chair with a lordly dignity, filled the
room. He was talking familiarly with the young gentlemen around him,
who were among `the first blood' of the city; men who would have
disdained
to acknowledge him in society, or recognize him in the street.
`Who is that person, Wittelsey?' asked Waldron, as they arm and arm
slowly approached him.
`Not to know him is to be yourself unknown! why, my dear fellow, that
is the immortal Frankton!'
`The proprietor of the establishment!'
`The same!'
`I have seen this man in the street, and I thought he was some foreign
Count.'
`You could'nt compliment him more efficiently than by telling him so.
He is as vain as but I will introduce you. That's what I came this way
for.'
`Thank you, no!' answered Waldron, `I had rather not make his
acquaintance
.'
`You must. Every stranger who enters here has to be presented to Lord
Frankton. You need not fear his recognising you in the street. He knows
well you would out him, and has too much pride to expose himself to insult.
So you are safe.'
`Ah, Mr. Wittelsey, you are welcome to-night,' said Frankton, without
moving from his attitude of negligent ease, and fixing as he spoke, his gaze
from under his dark brow closely upon the face of Waldron; that is,
addressing
the one, and bending his eyes upon the other!
`Allow me, Frankton, to introduce to you my particular friend and
relation
,
of whom you have heard me speak, (in uttering these last words he
looked significantly at the proprietor,' who caught and returned his glance
with a look of secret intelligence.) it is Mr Ralph Waldron. Ralph, this is
Mr. Frankfort, the proprietor of B Halls!'
Ralph bowed, and so did Mr. Frankton, with a polished movement of his
body, and a gracious smile. He then half rose and said, `Mr. Waldron I
am happy to have the honor of seeing you. Allow me to introduce you to
my friends here.'
Frankton then presented him to each, and gave him a seat by his side.
`Wine!' cried the proprietor to a black servant in livery, who stood
behind
his chair.
It was brought upon a silver waiter, and placed upon a bronzed pedestal
before him in the midst of the party.
`Music!' he commanded in an imperious tone. All at once came
swelling
from some invisible source, the sweet instrumental music that had
before
enchanted Waldron. The same rich female voice rose and mingled
with the instruments. He listened with delight, his senses bewildered and
entranced. In the meanwhile, Frankton had filled the half dozen glittering
goblets before him.
`Mr. Waldron, we drink your health!' said he, as he raised a goblet,
motioning to the others to do the same. Ralph drank with them, and then
was engaged in conversation by Frankton, who had a wonderful talent to
please when he chose to do so. He knew well whom he had before him.
From De Witt he had had all his history previously; and the latter had
bargained to give him one thousand dollars of the six thousand he hoped to
strip him of, to have the use of his rooms to play in. Waldron was
therefore
in a net, against the toils of which temperance alone could give him
power. But alas! temperance, that temperance which is temperate in
all
things
he had not known! Wine to him was destined to become his ruin,
as completely and as surely as brandy could have done. Frankton
knew
his man!
Not an incident of his life or character that would aid his cause
had Wittelsey omitted in his prior interview with the proprietor.
`If he drinks wine he is ours!' was the positive reply, at the time, of the
experienced Frankton.
The wine was freely passed by the subtle and dangerous accomplice of
Wittelsey, who remaining apparently indifferent, and having left the game in
Frankton's hands, did not, for fear of exciting suspicion, or afterwards
incurring
any reproaches from his victim, once urge him to drink. But with
the pressing politeness of the fascinating Frankton, the free companionship
of the young gentlemen around, the swell of ravishing music, the voluptuous
excitement of the novel place in which he found himself, with the
magiclike
and enchanting splendor of the surrounding scenes, all conspired to
cause him to yield up his senses to the delusive joys of the hour.
As a skillful physician watches the pulse of his patient to know the
moment
when to check the flow of blood from his opened veins, so the
experienced
proprietor of B Halls, watched the countenance of his victim, to
know precisely the moment to withdraw the bottle! As accurately as the
physician knows the powers and uses of his medicines, so he knew what
wines produces certain effects. Frankfort knew that a glass or two of
sherry
,
followed by champagne and brandy, by making him dull and sullen,
would produce a condition that would soon unfit
his
patient for play. He
knew that a sparkling tumbler of champagne first administered, then madeira
in one or two draughts, followed again by champagne, would produce
precisely
that condition most favorable to his object; a high degree of elevation
of the spirits, extravagantly generous feelings, social amenity, and an open,
acquiescing and reckless spirit, that yields itself with mad gaiety to any
temptation that may be presented. Such was the condition of Waldron,
when Frankton catching the eye of Wittelsey with a peculiar look of
satisfaction
,
gave a sign for the glasses to be removed.
`Come, Ralph, let us go in and see the players in the next room,' said
Wittelsey, taking his arm.
`Players! I have seen players and plays too, my boy!' answered
Waldron
,
with his face full of smiles, and looking altogether perfectly happy,
and being what Frankton termed very `prettily tipsy!' `Mr. Frankton, you
you are a gentlemen! You keekeep good wine, and d me if you
an't
a gentleman! if any man says to-to the con-con-con-con-connever
mind the rest o' the wordyou know what I mean, my boyI'll knock him
down!'
The proprietor looked savagely under his thick black brows, as if annoyed
by this equivocal compliment, and Wittelsey hurrying him away, they
entered
a room where some young men were betting at roulette. Ralph as he
walked, reeled `quite genteely,' swaying a little, but not absolutely
staggering
.
He was precisely in a fit state to do any thing that was hinted to him;
whether to kick up a row with watchman; tear off door-knockers; change
opposite store-signs, or
play!
Wittelsey lead him before the costly
silvermounted
roulette table, with its green cloth, particolored spots, burnished
and rapidly flying wheel.
`Double O O, red!' drawled, as they came up, a young man with the
thorough gambler's physiognomy, coarse and vicious; and at the same time
with a slender rod, tipped with a silver hook, he swept towards a pile a
stake which had been placed on single O
red
, by a young man who was the
only one playing.
`What game is this, De Witt?' demanded Ralph tipsily, and waving like
a poplar swayed by a gentle wind.
`Roulette! it is a fascinating game!'
`How is it played?'
E-lev-en
black!' drawled out, syllable by syllable, the gambler, and
casting
the while a quick furtive glance at Waldron, and
estimating
him, to use
an expressive phrase of the `fraternity.' Of Wittelsey he only took notice
by a slight half-nod; for this gentleman was well known there. The
gambler
,
or `banker,' having pronounced the number, shoved from a pile of gold
by his side, ten eagles, the player having staked upon the `eleven black,'
fifty dollars and won.
`You see how it is played,' answered De Witt. `These upon the cloth in
the black and red coloured checks are certain numbers, duplicates of which
you see are marked within the horizontal wheel in the centre of the board.
An ivory ball is spun from the fingers of the banker as you beheld, and the
wheel being set revolving simultaneously, the ball flies round and finally
rests, when the wheel is stopped, upon one of the numbers in the wheel.
Now if you place a dollar down upon one of the red squares, say number 7
red, drawn on the green cloth, and the ball on being spun rests on number
7 red in the wheel you are the winner. Otherwise you lose. If you place
your money on O O black or red, it is a law of the game that you win or
lose thirty-six times (I believe it is,) the amount of your stake. I once saw
a hundred dollars win thirty six hundred at this very table on those figures!
Now watch the ball!'
`Ten black!' monotonously sang the banker. `The money is on 9 black.
He loses. If it had been on ten he would have won,' said Wittelsey.
The banker extending his silver crook drew five of the eagles back to his
pile of gold from which he had just before paid them out; but always,
whether wining or losing with the same cold and indifferent look, and
repeating
the numbers in the same drawling, disagreeable, sing-song tone.
Wittelsey was closely and anxiously watching the countenance of Waldron.
He had too much policy to ask to play the friend he intended to ruin. He
was willing that wine should be his ally; and a true and faithful ally it
ever is to the wicked and designing, as they well know. Waldron was just
in that state which requires activity. The artificial fire and hilarity within
him struggled for external action. He wanted to exhaust the feeling in
outward
excitement. This was the natural effect of undue inward excitement.
Whatever, therefore, that offered him this activity, that promised vent to his
exhiliarating impetus in his blood, he would instinctively and gladly
embrace
.
There was no resistance, but rather a craving for free exercise and
developement. The drinker at this stage cannot be passive. He must be
doing. He must use his fierce powers. He must give full rein to his
extravagant
animation. Hence the midnight bouts with Charlies; the
uproarious
songs and mad frolies of homeward going bacchanals; hence the
recklessness
with which men rush to the gaming table! Such was the feeling
that possessed Waldron. Wittelsey saw it working and struggling for
action
.
If he had proposed boxing or fencing, Waldron would have here
found an avenue for his surplus flow of spirits. But this was no part of his
scheme.
Without speaking his intention, Waldron in a very dignified manner, all
at once drew from his purse a dollar and placed it after a second tipsy effort
with a slapping emphasis down upon the O O red! Wittelsey saw this act
with a joy he could ill conceal, and the banker observing his looks caught
his eye and slightly vibrated his left eye-lid; for he instantly comprehended
the whole matter. He cast the ball into the wheel and set it whirling.
Waldron watched the galloping motion of the little ivory coursed around
his revolving circus with an earnest interest. It stopped.
`Double O O Red!' called the man with some surprise.
`By Heaven, Ralph, you have won!' cried Wittelsey. `If it had been a
cool hundred now you would have got $3600 for your stake! You were
born under a lucky star, Waldron.'
`The star spangled banner and I are first cousins, my boy,' answered the
young merchant, gazing upon his friend's countenance with a beaming
smile of ludicrous tenderness. He then began to sing in a mellow voice
`The star of love is beaming,'
`The wheel waits, Ralph,' said Wittelsey.
`Waits, eh? go it little ivory!' he cried, winking funnily at the banker,
and throwing his arm affectionately about Wittelsey's neck to support
himself
,
for he swung backward and then forward like a pendulum wrong end
up. `There it is again, double O O black!' said he placing the thirty-two
dollars upon these figures in the black square. The ball went rattling and
clattering around the flying circle and rested upon the answering number
in the wheel.
`Double O O black!' drawled the banker; and rapidly counting out
thirty-two
times the amount of his stake pushed it towards him.
We will not follow out in detail this painful scene. Inspired by his two
first brilliant successes, Ralph entered with all his spirit into the play, and
at midnight, after two hours and a half play he was a loser of nine hundred
dollars, for which he, with a heavy heart, for he was now perfectly sober,
gave a check to Frankton; this person always keeping such blank
conveniences
in a room at the foot of the stairs, which he used as an office. The
money won from him by the banker was to go to Wittelsey, according to
the contract, the proprietor taking his proportion as bargained for, as well
as the usual percentage.
The next morning Ralph felt more miserable than he had ever felt in his
life. He recalled as well as he could all that had passed, and groaned in
spirit. At the moment of his deepest shame and regret, Wittelsey entered.
Ralph wanted society and hailed his appearance with pleasure. De Witt
seeing how he was, prescribed brandy and water, and sending to the bar,
Waldron being at a hotel, he persuaded him to drink it. He soon felt
better
,
and the blues of remorse vanished.
From that day Waldron began to descend. He was prevailed by De
Witt to try to recover what he had lost by betting at other games. He
alternately
lost and won, but still inspired by the hopes of winning all back he
nightly resorted to Frankton's; nightly drank deeply, and played heavily,
and each night involved himself deeper and deeper. At length he drew
the last dollar from the bank which he had placed there but two months
before
,
(for only that length of time had he been in the city,) to be used by the
House whenever the sum should be required for certain contemplated
transactions
.
At the same time he addressed Mr. Ward the following brief note.
Howard Hotel
,
Nov.
5, 1842.
`
Sir
,Having withdrawn my money from bank, I withdraw myself from
the firm. Ask me for no explanations; for I have none to give. I have
chosen my own course and must abide by it.
Ralph Waldron
.
Poor Waldron had indeed chosen his own course, and sadly did he abide
by it, as will be shown hereafter.
3
CHAPTER VI.
We now return to pursue the career of our chief hero, Edward Austin.
He had arrived in New York about three weeks after Ralph; and as he had
come for the purpose of looking round for the most advantageous mode of
investing the few thousand dollars he brought with him, he put up at the
Howard House as being more likely there to fall in with men of business,
and so become acquainted with the best avenues for commercial adventure.
Anne Laurens was in town at her father's when he arrived, and his first
visit after taking possession of his room and carefully making his toilet was
directed, of course, to the residence of Mr. Laurens in Carrol Place,
Bleecker Street.
It is unnecessary to give the particulars of the kind and flattering
reception
extended to him by Anne and her father. The latter, who now began
to feel an interest in him that was paternal, soon after proceeded to enter
upon a conversation with him touching his prospects; to which Miss
Laurens
was by no means an uninterested listener, her eyes all the while being
scarcely removed from the face of him she loved. Edward, happy in her
reciprocal affection and in the approbation of her father, conscious too of
his moral worth and integrity of character, felt her bosom glow with
grateful
joy and calm peace as he sat together with them, the father on his right
the daughter on his left; for Anne, laughing, had said she would take the
place
nighest
his heart!
`You have six thousand and eight hundred dollars, Edward!' said Mr.
Laurens. `Well that is a fair beginning for a young man in a city like
New York. In two years you ought to double it. What kind of business
are you inclined to?'
`I have no particular
penchant
that I am aware of! I will let Anne choose,'
he answered laughing and glancing at the blooming girl by his side.
`I should choose some business that would'nt keep you much away from
me,' she said blushing at her own frankness in thus anticipating when she
should become his wife, and as such covet his society.
`I don't know of any, girl,' answered her father with a smile in the
corner
of his eye,' unless he opens a man millinery in Broadway, you keep in
the back shop and Edward in the front!'
`Father, how can you?' cried the maiden rapping his cheek lightly with
her fan. `I shan't say any thing more, but let you and Edward settle it
together!'
`We will allow you a casting vote, Anne,' said Edward with a playful
look. `The truth is, Mr. Laurens, I have a notion I should like the
business
of a French importing house! But I fear my little capital would not
go far in such a business!'
`It is a good business, my boy; a good business; though, as you say, it
requires a large capital. You speak French. This will be of great
advantage
,
as you can then visit France and select your own goods. I have no
doubt that you could find a good Importing House that would take you as a
junior partner with what money you have, and give you that part of the
business
which lies in Paris!'
`I should like this but for one reason,' he said hesitatating and looking at
Miss Laurens.
`What is this?' demanded the old gentleman half guessing what it was
from his looks.
`The deprivation of the society in which I now find myself so happy!'
`Oh, I see! You don't want to be separated from Anne! Well, perhaps,
we could fix
that!
The girl might like to see Paris, too! Hey, Anne, you
rogue!'
`It is just as you say, dear father,' she answered demurely, her depressed
eyes tracing out the figures upon the carpet.'
`Just as I please. It would'nt have been just as I pleased, if I did'nt want
you to marry Edward! It would then have been just as you pleased! well,
I am glad it is just as we all please, Anne, my dear! You shall go to Paris if
Ned goes! Come, now don't look so like a full blown peony. Kiss me and
tell me you have got the most indulgent and loving father in the world!
Don't make a mistake before you get past Edward and kiss him instead!'
`Father! father!' she cried pressing her small hand over his lips and
silencing
him; `you must think'
`What do I think. I think you are the handsomest girl in the Empire
state and Edward, the young dog, ought to be as proud of you as, as
don't smother me with kisses! there, that will do, I won't plague you, child.'
`I am proud of her, my dear sir,' answered Edward with an enthusiasm
that filled her young bosom with pride and joy; `I know not how to be
properly grateful to you, sir, for your indulgence and favor. It shall be my
endeavor to make myself worthy of your confidence and to render her life
happy.'
`A very pretty speech, my boy. I know you will make her happy. Plato!'
he called to a servant with a jet black skin and a grey head, who was
passing
out of the room which he had entered to replace some articles in the
side-board.
`Sir!'
`Put out that decanter of Paulding's Pale I opened for judge Williston
when he dined with me yesterday.'
`Yes sir,' answered the African with a polite bow.
I will see two or three friends I have in the line of French Importations
to-morrow, my boy, and I think in a few days I shall find you a House that
will please you. In the meanwhile you can look round for yourself, and
you can refer to me if you choose!'
`Sir, you are very kind,' answered Edward.
`Poh, poh! don't thank me for what any body would willingly do for you.
You are a young man of pure character, upright morals, sterling integrity.
I know it to be true, so don't blush as Anne here does sometimes. Ah, girl,
your eyes dance like diamonds! so you like to hear him praised!'
`The wine ready, sir,' answered the negro, placing upon a small Chinese
tripod, a chased silver salver containing a glittering decanter filled with the
most delicate amber-colored Sherry, and three wine-glasses of the most
delicate form.
`Come, Edward, said the retired merchant, taking up the crystal
decanter
and laying the massive stopper upon the salver,' let us take a glass of
wine to Anne's visit to Paris as your wife; and to your success as a
Merchant
!
Ah, this is a delicate flavor,' he added, pausing to inhale it with that
exquisite sense of enjoyment which characterizes the connoisseur; `this
importation of Paulding's is superior to any wine that has crossed the seas
for many a year; not since that of the great earthquake vintage!'
`I have heard of such a vintage, also of Comet wines, sir!' said Edward,
`is it true that such circumstances really effect the grape from which the
wines are made?'
`Yes; at least such is the impression; but to be frank, I have little faith
in the influence of comets and earthquakes upon wines! It has chanced
that in such years, the wines have proved unusually good; and that is as
likely to be owing to accident as to physical phenomena. Come, Edward
take your wine!' added Mr. Laurens, who while he was talking had been
filling the three glasses before him. Anne, my dear, here is yours!'
`I will take but a sip, father,' she answered, receiving it in her hand.
`You dont take yours, Edward! We are waiting for you!' said Mr.
Laurens
raising the sparkling wine-glass, and reaching it towards him.
`Thank you, sir, but really I have never drank wine in my life,'
answered
Edward blushing and stammering.
`I know your mother has brought you up with very temperate habits.
But a glass of this pure wine will do you no harm! I wish you to taste it,
for if you have never drank any wine, I desire that the first you taste should
be pure and delicately flavored. Try this, and as you are so temperate, I
will not tempt you again! You see Anne is not afraid to drink it!'
`I should rather be excused, sir;' hesitatingly answered Edward who, to
keep Mr. Laurens from holding out his hand, had taken the wine-glass from
him, and now held it with an uncertain grasp between his fore finger and
thumb, while the image of Ralph Waldron rising painfully to his mind
nerved
him to a firm refusal.
`Anne will have to challenge you, I see, said Mr. Laurens laughing.
`Come, girl, pledge him to his success as a merchant! I will pledge him to
drink to you as his bride!'
`Edward will you accept my challenge?' asked Miss Laurens with a
smile.
`What I could refuse to your father I have not the firmness to refuse to
you,' he said reflecting her smile in his eyes as he gazed upon her with
mingled love and tenderness. `I will drink to you Anne with pleasure, but
to tell the truth my mother has instilled into my mind from earliest youth
such a horror of intemperance, that I have hitherto looked upon a
wine-glass
,
as if I saw labelled upon it, `Poison' like vials in an apothecaries
shop. But I will this once accept your pledge. It is my first and my last
glass of wine.'
`That is a good resolution, Edward,' said Mr. Laurens. `If you have such
feelings, I am the last person that should encourage you to depart from
them. But I do not fear you. You are too well grounded with your
principles
to be in any danger from the wine cup. Here, my boy is to your
success as a merchant, and to your happiness, my dear Anne, as his bride!'
Mr. Laurens emptied his glass slowly and with that lingering relish of the
wine which is the peculiar habit of amateurs. Anne slightly tasted her glass
and replaced it upon the salver. Edward also lifted his to his lips, but to
taste; but had no sooner let the rich, insinuating flavor of this exquisitely
soft beverage of the grape come in contact with his palate than, taken by
surprise at the unexpected delicacy of its taste he suffered it to flow and
dissolve over his palate, indulging, with irresistible delight the new
sensation
.
Startled suddenly at the consciousness of yielding to the dangerous
gratification
of the sense of taste, and alarmed at the thought how easily he
might come to love wine, he abruptly put down his glass and with such
vehemence
that the slender stem snapped off, and the wine, for he had but
half emptied the glass, and the fragments of shivered crystal were mingled
upon the shining salver.
`I am exceedingly awkward,' he said confused, yet feeling a great relief,
as if from a temptation, on seeing the glass fall.
`Oh, it is of no consequence,' said Mr. Laurens. `What a charming odor
this wine throws out as it evaporates! I will fill for you again! You hardly
have had taste of its flavor!'
Plato on seeing the glass break, flew to the side board and immediately
replaced it with another, which Mr. Laurens now filled.
`The wine seems to me very good,' answered Edward `but I will take no
more! I am of course no judge of wines!'
`If it pleases your palate, you are as good a judge as any body! It is not
so difficult to say whether good wine is good, but to decide upon wines, the
credit of which is not yet established!'
`You are very fond of wines, sir!
`Yes; though I do not drink much. I am only a table-drinker! do not
recollect
that I ever drank a glass of wine, and certainly I have drank nothing
besides wine, except at dinner, or in the evening socially as we are taking it
now, in my life. I have been in the custom of taking a glass or two of
sherry
after dinner ever since I kept house. If by any chance I do not have it, I
suffer with indigestion. But, my boy, though I do not think there is any
harm in a glass of wine at table, I would not recommend you to follow the
custom; for it is a habit and all habits sooner or later, get to be so a part of
ourselves, that they become quite vexatious to one. Now, in travelling,
when by any chance I dined without being able to have a glass of wine after,
I have been out of sorts all the rest of the day, and to tell you the truth, in
down-right ill humor! If I was not an old man I would try and break it off;
but I can recommend you not to let any thing become a habit with you
except
prayer, going to church and reading your bible! Good habits will
become
a part of your character and in a young man of right principles just as
easy as bad ones. So, my dear boy, you have my opinion, and now take
your glass and drink to your good habits!'
If Edward smiled at the abrupt transition of Mr. Laurens in his address,
in recommending to him the habit of prayer and church going, he felt quite
as much surprized and amazed at the conclusion of his discourse. Anne
saw at once the impression upon his mind and catching his eye smiled and
said:
`I see, Edward, that you think father has a very odd way, after giving his
advice, of enforcing it! Father does not consider there is the least harm in a
glass of wine, he has so long been accustomed to it; and he regards it as
an old fashioned custom that ought to be held in esteem. I hope you will
not think he holds lightly your strict temperance. I assure you, that although
I have never held a glass of wine taken with my father, at all wrong, I
should be the last person to wish you to break a resolution!'
`I have never made a resolution not to drink! I have never made a
resolution
not to
lie
nor have I that I will not
swear
nor
steal
! I have been
educated
and grown up with precisely the same moral feeling with reference
to intemperance that I have in regard to these vices. Against neither the
one nor the other have I formed resolutions; for there is a higher sentiment
within which I feel will protect me from ever indulging them! In tasting
this wine, Anne, I have broken no resolution; otherwise I should not have
lifted the glass to my lips. In tasting it with you, I have not felt, nor do I
feel guilty of intemperance. I cannot by any means, associate that vice
with this social scene.'
`You have said well, my boy! I admire your sentiments. You are in no
danger of ever being a wine drinker, I see plainly. I am glad of it. There
are great temptations in this city to young men, and especially to young
merchants who must often dine and wine their heavy customers. Empty
your glass. You quite lost the other. I want the opinion of a fresh palate
upon this wine!'
Edward smiled, and partly because he would again enjoy the novel and
exquisite flavor which still lingered upon his taste, partly to gratify Mr.
Laurens
,
and partly to show him that he was not afraid of becoming a
winedrinker
he raised the sparkling glass, and brought it gently to his lips.
`It is indeed a most winning beverage, sir. Is all wine so palatable?'
`No, by no means! This is a rare `seal.' I am glad you are pleased with
it. I have but a few bottles of it. This one I opened and decanted
yesterday
for Judge Williston! The Judge is a great connoiseur! well, touching
your business affair! I will not fail to have it all arranged for you. There
are my friends, Mordent, Godine & Co. in Pearl St. I think they are the
very House! Drop in and dine with me to-morrow and I will tell you what
I have done for you!'
The conversation now passed from subject to subject, and as Mr. Laurens,
at pauses in it would raise his wine-glass to his lips and sip, so Edward,
who held his, dallying with it in his fingers, from time to time insensibly
found himself imitating him; till, at length, after the lapse of a quarter of
an hour, Mr. Laurens seeing it nearly empty, pushed the decanter towards
him, saying, laughing,
`I see you like my wine in spite of yourself, my dear boy! Try another
glass. It will not hurt you!'
`I was unconscious that I had emptied my glass, said Edward colouring,
and looking at Anne, he added, `I tear, Miss Laurens, you will not give me
credit for consistency; but really, in the excitement of conversation, I was
not aware that I was stealing the wine so insinuatingly from my glass!'
Edward had well said `the excitement' of conversation; for he had
talked
with unusual enthusiasm for him. The deceitful influence of the
hightoned
wine had insensibly quickened his blood and elevated his spirits, and
lessened the rigid and habitual guard which he kept over himself. He
did not utter one word out of the way, or betray any undue levity; the
effect
of the glass and half he had drank was only visible in a certain energy
in his expressions and a sparkling gaiety in his eyes. Mr. Laurens only
thought him clever and more entertaining than he had supposed him to be
and Anne, without once suspecting the true cause, thought he looked and
conversed much more interestingly than usual.
The evening passed away, and Edward, fairly refusing to replenish his
glass, took his leave and returned to the Hotel. He did not return to bed
without an unpleasant sensation of regret that he should for the first time in
his life, yield, though moderately, and in the presence of his betrothed bride
and her father, to an indulgence, for which he had reproved and despised
Ralph Waldron.
`But then,' he said in self acquital as he laid his head upon the pillow;
`it was brandy that Ralph drank from his hunting flask!'
The ensuing day Edward went early to his appointment with Mr.
Laurens
that he might have an hour with Anne in the drawing-room before
dinner. It was an hour of pure and unmixed happiness. There was no
allusion made to the events of the previous evening; for to Anne's mind
they had not again recurred, she not not having regarded his light
indulgence
as worth a moment's after thought. Edward also had ceased to let
it trouble him. They talked of his future prospectsof the probability of
a voyage to Europe, of the fascinations and pleasures of the gay
metropolis
of France; and above all and with all of their marriage, which both
hoped
would be soon. Both were perfectly happy; both virtuous, honorable
and good; and there seemed to the eye of hope nothing visible in the bright
vista of the future to cast a cloud over the silvery horizon of their loves!
At dinner Mr. Laurens informed Edward that he had seen and spoken
with the French Importers, Mordent, Godine & Co. `I represented your
wishes and views to them; and they expressed themselves gratified at the
opportunity of availing themselves of your proposition to join them in
business
.
They said that their present junior partner, who had been in Paris some
years was about returning to America for his health; when he would
withdraw
from the firm, and that as he was looked for in four or five weeks, if you
would wait until then, they would be happy to have you supply his place
both in the firm and at Paris. In the meanwhile, they added, that you had
best call and see them, and remain as much time in their store each day as
you saw fit, to become acquainted with the style of goods imported, and the
other duties which would be required of you! so, my dear boy, you are fixed
without any trouble. This is one of the heaviest houses in the city, and the
Firm is composed of two of the best men I know of. Let me congratulate
you on your good luck.'
Edward expressed, in very warm terms his grateful sense of what Mr.
Laurens had achieved in his behalf; and Anne was not backward in
thanking
her father and in manifesting her happiness; for this favorable turn of
affairs would sooner bring about their union, as it was a settled matter that
if Edward went to France he should be married and take Anne with him.
Mr. Laurens could not let this happy adjustment of so important an
affair
pass by without celebrating it by a bumper and so filled their
wine-glasses
:
`But half a drop, my dear father!' said Anne with eyes sparkling with joy.
`And less than that for me, sir!' said Edward; but ere he checked the
decanter, his glass was already running over.
`Nay, you must not be too rigid, my boy on such an occasion! Here is
health and happiness to you both my children! God bless you, and never
let the sunny morning of your lives be clouded by a single sorrow!' As he
spoke thus feelingly, he reverently, while a tear glistened in his eye, placed
the wine-glass to his lips. Anne and Edward instinctively followed his
example
,
and in silence they drank to this touching parental benison! Not to
have done so, Edward felt would have been like refusing his assent to the
blessing invoked upon him and Anne; and thus the act became, as it were,
invested with a sacred sentiment in his eyes!
Daily for some weeks, Edward was a visiter at the mansion of Mr.
Laurens
;
and often he found himself a guest at the dinner-table, sometimes
alone
,
but oftener with companytwo or three friends of the merchant. The
few glasses of rich wine he had imbibed had given him a relish for its
peculiar
flavor; in a word, he had not dined a third time with Mr. Laurens before
he found himself filling his own glass from the decanter and pledging Anne
to drink with him. Less than three weeks it certainly was not, before Mr.
Laurens had only to push the decanter across the polished board to him with
a nod to refill! and ere a month elapsed, Anne, as one day she left the table,
had to give him a gentle warning look of caution in indulging, to which he
returned a gay laugh, and replied, while he blushed,
`Never fear, dear Anne, it is only your father's wine I love!'
CHAPTER VII.
At
the end of several weeks, a letter was received from the junior
partner
of the French House, for whom Edward was waiting, saying that he
should not leave for New York under ten days, when, on his arrival he
should close up his affairs with the firm and withdraw from it. During the
interval of delay, Edward continued diligently to pass four or five hours, in
fact, every forenoon in the counting-house in Pearl street, devoting himself
to the details of the business upon which he contemplated entering. But
during this period he also frequently visited at Mr. Laurens' mansion, and
there formed the dangerous habit of taking wine at dinner. Nor was he
blind to this fact of a growing habit.
`I will leave it off altogether,' said he to his conscience, `as soon as I form
the connection with this firm!'
He had been, when he said this, for some weeks under this influence of
social table-drinking
, and it wanted three weeks to the time of the arrival of
the gentleman whose position he was to take.
It was on the evening of the very day on which he had made this
resolution
that he left the table of Mr. Laurens a little flushed with the generous
wines of his cruelly hospitable and thoughtless host, and sought his rooms
at his hotel at an hour earlier than was his habit, from a painful sense that
his step was unsteady and might betray him; and at the same time with a
feeling of shame so deep that he inwardly resolved that he would never take
another glass of wine! But resolutions made in a state of partial
inebriation
are no oftener regarded in sobriety, than those made in sobriety are
heeded `when the wine is in.'
On his way to his room he passed a half open door at the head of the hall
which he knew to be the servant's waiting room. Hearing his own name
spoken as he passed he checked his steps and listened, supposing he was
called.
`I can't do it now, and so don't try and tempt me with the tarnel kritter,'
said the well known voice of his `valet' Roundy Beebe. `I never drink'd
nothin' stronger nor water, 'cept it mout be milk, and I don't mean to
nuther
,
till I has more orakkler evidence as my master Edward drinks than your
word! Ven he tipples, I Roundy, tipples; so long as he's sober, I keeps
sober. He's my model pattern for time and tarnity!'
`You need'nt be afther makin' sich a pother, spalpeen,' answered a rich
Irish brogue, which Edward recognised as belonging to the second porter;
`I did but in kindness offer ye a bit o' the whiskey, as kapes the life in me
shoul and body. But if ye only wait till Misther Edward dhrinks, its
meeself
as can pruv it to ye, Roondy. Not that I'd guv a stiver to tempt the
likes o' ye to be afther dhrinking; ony whiles we are kapin ach odther
company here till yer masther comes home, or I have a call, I'd like to make
it plisint and sociable to both of us.'
`If you don't prove my master Edward drinks, I'll knock you down, that's
what I will!' answered Roundy very positively.
`Its niver yer two fists I'd be afther mindin' at all, honney; but misther
Edward ordhered a day-kanther o' wine yisterday for his dinner, for I stood
behind his chair, and was the viry lad as he bade go fetch it til him!'
`Is it true, Jemmy?'
`De'il a bit lie in it from top to toe. I'll tak mee sackrament oath on it!'
`And did master Edward drink it?'
`To the full o' four glasses!'
`That's what I never'd believe! I'll not believe it neither, till I see him.
Now if he'd only let me wait on him at his dinner, he'd never sent for it,
and I'd never got it for him. I'd said to him, master Edward remember
your mother, and don't forget that flask tippler Ralph Waldron, you used to
talk to. Don't, dear master, get to taking to the ways of this wicked city,
which I wish I was well out of, Jemmy; for if the horrid satan don't reign
here he beant no wheres on airth; oh, dear me, Jemmy, if master Edward
has got to takin' wine, I fear its all up with us.'
Edward did not feel in the mood of hearing more, and passed on to his
room, with feelings of the deepest chagrin, and a sense of humiliation, that
for the moment made him feel inferior to his own servant. He shut his
door and paced thoughtfully up and down his chamber. He had received
from Roundy's words a cutting reproof. It led him to view his true
position
,
and to confirm and strengthen his resolution not to drink again.
Roundy
in a little while came to his room.
`Ah, so you are comed home, Master Edward,' said Roundy, looking at
him very hard; for Edward's face was flushed, and the lids of his eyes heavy
while the pupil was unusually bright. Roundy also very plainly scented
the fragrance of wine, and his suspicions already aroused by Jemmy, he
resolved to ascertain if his master had been really drinking; for he thought
he looked very like it,
`Roundy you may go, I don't want any thing to-night,' said Edward
quickly, fearing he might discover what he wished to conceal from him.
`Yes, master Edward, but the window is up. I will shut it.'
`I just threw it up myself. Go!'
Roundy stood a moment with his hand upon the door, as if he wished to
ask something. Edward fearing that he would question him about taking
wine at the table, and being in no mood to be interrogated, even by this
simple-minded young man, he repeated peremptorily his orders for him to
leave the room. Roundy obeyed; but as he closed the door he sighed
heavily
,
and said to himself, `I see how it is. He never was so before; his eyes
are red and he speaks sharp. I see how it is! I smelt the wine as plain as
if a demijohn was in the room. I fear Master Edward is got into
temptation
in this Babylonist city of distinction and ungodly doin's. But I won't
guv up. I'll see if he don't get over it; and if as how as he does't why I'll
drink too; coz if master Nedward goes to the devil, I'll go with him. So
there'll be two of us!'
The next morning Edward awoke with a sense of shame and
self-reproach
.
The resolutions he had made the night before he now solemnly
repeated, and kneeling by his bedside fervently implored the divine
guidance
.
Roundy as he came in to wait upon him appeared sad, and silently
performed his duties about his person.
`Roundy,' said Edward as he was tying his scarf, and speaking in a
pleasant
tone.
`Master Nedward!' responded Roundy with a profound sigh.
`What makes you so silent this morning?'
`I was thinkin', master Nedward.'
`Thinking?'
`Yes, master Nedward,' and Roundy sighed again, more heavily than
before
;
indeed, his sigh partook of the character of a groan.
`And what was you thinking about?'
`Whether I should get drunk on whiskey or heavy wet,' replied Roundy
In a very triste and sorrowful tone.
Edward understood at once the drift of his meaning, and could not help
laughing very heartily.
`Ah, I see how it is, Roundy. You think I have been setting you a bad
example. The truth is, I have taken a little wine at dinner lately with a
few friends, and only to oblige them.'
`But, master Nedward, Jemmy says you called for a decanter when you
was dining alone. If it was only with friends and stopped then, there
might be hopes of you; but when you likes it so well as to drink by
yourself
,'
`That will do, Roundy,' interrupted Edward quickly in a displeased tone.
`I did not bring you to the city with me to be my mentor and to watch and
rebuke my conduct. For the future hold your tongue. I shall drink no
more wine, so do not trouble yourself and take on as if I was already a
drunkard.'
He finished his toilet in silence, and Roundy did not again open his mouth,
though at intervals he would sigh very heavily, and from time to time
slowly
shake his head in a manner ludicrously desponding.
The habit of taking a glass of wine at dinner was only confined to the
table
.
Edward never thought about it except at the board, and, therefore, he
had full confidence that he should never be tempted to indulge in it to
excess
.
`Nevertheless,' he said, as he left his hotel to go to his counting-room;
`nevertheless, as it is becoming a
habit
, and the love of it may fasten upon
me, I will give it up hence forever; though I have no apprehensions, that
by continuing to take a glass or two with my dinner, I should do myself any
injury. I do not think even Anne would tempt me to drink wine again.
But there is no danger from this source; I see already that she trembles to
leave me at table with her father, though she has not spoken to me save by
eloquent looks that she thinks I may indulge too freely. Yesterday
afternoon
I did take more than I ought to have done; but as Mr. Laurens'
friends were politicians and drank political toasts, I could not refuse but
with ill grace. I would no longer say what I could have said a month ago,
`I never drink any wine!' I wish from my soul I could say so now. But
'tis past, and I must now substitute
resolution
for a
principle!
This is a sad
falling away!'
His features expressed regret and mortification, and with a troubled mind
he sought his place of business.
On his return to his hotel he was surprised and gratified to find Mr.
Lanrens
waiting to see him.
`Ah, my dear Edward, I have called to invite you to accompany us to see
Macready in Hamlet to-night. I have been to secure seats for three. You
will be up and take your tea with us, and let us start early for the house will
be crammed.'
`I assure you I consent with great pleasure. But you will not go home
now. We dine now and I must have the honor of your company. In
catching you here I hold you as a rare prize.'
`Well, to tell the truth I half made up my mind before I came in to dine
with you; so you have me without much pressing.'
`You are very kind. After dinner I will ride up with you.'
`That is my plan, also. There is'
What further Mr. Laurens was about to say was lost in the loud roar of
the gong which resounding throughout the vast hotel seemed to shake the
massive structure to its very foundation.
`What a confounded noise!' cried Mr. Laurens, taking his fingers out of
his ears when it had ceased. `This uproar three times a day would be
enough to keep me from living at a hotel. It is deafening. If a gong is to
be sounded why don't they have mercy on people's nerves and ears, and
sound from some distant quarter, and not directly among christian people!
It is a barbarous invention!'
While Mr. Laurens was giving out this philippic against gongs, Edward
was conducting him in to the dining room.
`Every thing is very fine here and in good taste. Table very
handsomely
arrayed!' said Mr. Laurens as he received his soup from the hands of
Roundy, who had stationed himself behind his master's chair.
As the soups were being removed Edward saw a decanter placed by a
servant before the gentleman opposite to him; and instantly the thought
flashed upon his mind that he must order wine for Mr. Laurens. He felt
his face glow at the thought and at the recollection of his own resolution.
`I
must
get wine for Mr. Laurens, but I need not drink any myself,' he
said in his mind. Taking out his pencil he wrote on a card. `Roundy?'
`Master Nedward!'
`Take this card to Mr., at the office!'
`What is it for?' stoutly asked the suspicious young countryman.
`It is of no consequence to you. Take it and bring to me what he gives
you.'
Roundy departed and leaving the hall gave the card to Mr., saying,
`My master wants me to hand you this. It reads. `1 Dec. Paulpale.
No, 4I can't make out no meanin' to it, can yew?'
`There is what it means,' said the gentleman smiling and handing him a
decanter of Paulding's Pale Sherry.
`What's that are?wine?'
`Yes, take it to Mr. Austin.'
`I'm darn'd if I touch it,' answered Roundy roundly.
`Then what are you doing in the dining room? Take it at once!'
`Wall, I'll take it to him. Pr'aps he ony wants it for the old gentlemen,
as I knows loves wine like a robin loves cherries. I take it, tho' agen my
conscience an' contrary to what I knows is rite; but if enny thing happens,
them as guvs it to me must take the konsekenses.'
`You have been a long while gone,' said Edward angrily.
`There it is, master Nedward, and I warns you!' said Roundy solemnly,
as he placed the decanter emphatically upon the table.
`Ah, that wine has fine colour and transparency, Edward,' said Mr.
Laurens
,
eyeing the decanter.
`It is your favorite wine, sir; allow me to fill your glass.'
`You were very kind to think of me, my boy. But your own glass?'
`Ithat isexcuse meI am not'
`Pohif your head aches it will do you good. Come, come! you will not
let me dine with you and drink alone.'
If Mr. Laurens had formed a plan for tempting his intended son-in-law
to intemperance, he could not have pursued it more directly or earnestly
than he now acted. But himself, for years a moderate `table-drinker,' in
safety, he did not once suspect the consequences that might follow to
another
.
Even Edward's gradual but growing partiality for wine did not open
his eyes.
`I will then drink a glass with you, sir, though I made a resolution
to-day
I would not drink again.'
`If I thought you had not sense and firmness enough to govern your
appetite
,
I should be the last to ask you to take wine. But I have no more
fear of you than I have of myself.'
Edward quietly filled his own wine-glass, but while he was doing it he
seemed to feel the touch of an icy finger upon his heart. He felt that he
was doing a moral wrong to his conscience and degrading himself in his
own eyes; for men when they deliberately break a resolution feel, in spite
of themselves, humbled and experience an indescribable sensation of
self-contempt
.
They then become judges of themselves and pass the sentence
of condemnation as severely, if not far more so, upon their own act of
weakness as if they had sat in judgment upon the conduct of another.
The dinner progressed and Edward having once broken his resolution
had no further sense of restraint beyond mere inclination and propriety.
`In for a penny, in for a pound,' is a very homely and old fashioned proverb;
but it is full of meaning. The feeling it quaintly expresses Edward realised,
and as he had taken one glass of wine he suffered himself, soon after to take
a second, yet inwardly resolving that this days dinner should witness his
last wine-drinking. Men contending with dangerous temptations to which
they see they are inclined are always resolving and re-resolving, till seeing
their own weakness they finally cease to resolve, and in a sort of despair,
yield to the current against which they have been so impotently struggling.
Towards the close of the dinner Edward recognised and bowed to an old
college acquaintance he had not seen for some years. A desire to confirm
the mutual recognition by sending his wine to him was irresistible, he being
too far off up the table to interchange words. So he wrote on a card,
`
Edward Austin's compliments to his old friend, Henry Collins
.'
`Take my wine and this card to the gentleman in the buff vest,' said
Edward
to Roundy.
Roundy took the decanter with a very serious countenance on which was
for him a look of singular and peculiar determination, and performed the
commission without making any mistake.
Edward saw his friend hesitate, turn pale, then blush and fill his
wine-glass
.
The two friends then nodded, smiled and drank of their sparkling
bumpers. As the guests rose and withdrew, a place by Edward's side was
left vacant, and Henry Collins seeing it left his chair and came and
occupied
it. He was warmly welcomed by Edward, and presented to Mr.
Laurens
.
This gentleman at once recognised in him the son of an old friend,
and after many inquiries after his father, Mr. Laurens invited him to take
wine with him.
`I rarely indulge, sir,' answered Henry; `but on this occasion with you
and Edward, I don't know how to refuse.'
Harry Collins had once been very intemperate, and at one period was
nearly wrecked, soul and body, by habitual intoxication. But he had some
months ago reformed. He had recovered himself and his self-respect, and
was once more respected in the society in which he lived, which was in a
neighboring state. He had only come to the city three days before. He had
not for months touched wine or any thing the drunkard loves. He felt
himself
a man! He was invited to drink by his old friend and class-mate; the
sight of his friend, the recognising smile, the unexpected pleasure of the
recontre
at table, the offer of the pleasant looking wine, the reluctance to
refuse
at such a moment, the inward resolution that it was only for
then
conquered
.
But he had not yielded without a severe struggle, which as we
have seen, manifested its intensity in his changing colour.
He could not now refuse so respectable a looking person as Mr. Laurens.
Neither could Edward decline joining in the round. They drank. Collins
drank his off with a sort of wild delight. He gazed on the decanter after he
had emptied his wine-glass and looked wistfully. The conversation
proceeded
.
He did not give it his mind. He was absent and often answered
at random. Scarcely could he keep his eyes off the glowing wine before
him. Suddenly he grasped the decanter:
`Excuse me, Austin, but you must drink with me. I have heard you are
to be married. I drink to your happiness.'
`He filled Edward's glass, that of Mr. Laurens and his own. But why
need we proceed in detailing the steps of this painful scene. When at
length Edward called for Champagne, Mr. Laurens rose to go, saying, with
a smile,
`Come, come, young gentlemen. You must not sit here any longer. I
find you outdo an old winer like me. You have had quite enough!'
`That's my 'pinion too,' echoed Roundy in a very positive tone.
Edward rose and his friend also; and as the former was quite
unpleasantly
conscious that he had taken too many glasses of wine to present
himself
at once before Anne, he excused himself to Mr. Laurens on the plea of
a desire to talk over `old times,' with his friend Harry.
`Well, then, my dear boy, I will ride up, and we will expect you at six.'
Edward saw Mr. Laurens into an omnibus, and then invited Harry to his
room. Here they began a conversation touching each other's career, and
both talked with great animation, for their tongues and memories were
excited
by wine.
`Come, Ned,' at length said Harry, `this is dry work; let me as an old
friend take the liberty of ordering that Champagne Mr. Laurens vetoed to
to be sent up here,' as he spoke he pulled the bell which was within his
reach.
`A bottle of Champagne and two glasses,' said Edward to the servant.
`Stay, where is Roundy?'
`I hav'nt seen him, sir.'
`If you see him send him to me.'
We can tell where Roundy was. After Edward and his friends had left
the table, he carefully poured the little wine left in their glasses back into
the decanter, and taking it underneath his arm, while he slighly pocketed a
wine-glass, he took his way up stairs to the waiting-room, or servant's lodge.
Here he seated himself upon a trunk, and setting down the decanter and
glass upon a chair before him, thus solioquised.
`It's a go with us now, no mistake. Master Nedward is in for it, and I
mus'nt be left behind. I seed him drink four glasses and a half o' clear
wine, and I could'nt ha' believed it if I had'nt seen it with my own two eyes.
Well, who'd ha' thought this o' master Nedward, as preached so to young
Mr. Waldron there in the woods coz he drinked out of a flask. I don't
know which is worstest, a flask or a dekanter. Master Nedward's
decanter
is twice as big as Ralph's hunting flask. Oh dear me! Well, I must
come to it. Here goes! It's enough to make me cry like a baby.'
As he spoke, Roundy filled the wine-glass, and while big tears chased
each other down his fat cheeks he drank off the wine. The taste was new
to him, and the strength being something for his unaccustomed palate, he
nearly strangled.
`Never mind if it kills me dead I'll drink it. I must keep up with
master
Nedward. If he gets drunk, I gets drunk. We be as inseperable as the
Siamese Twins.'
There were about two glasses and a half in the decanter, and Roundy
drank the last remaining drop. The wine soon began to exhibit its effects.
He rose up, kicked over the chair, and began to dance, singing at the top of
his voice,
`Jerry GoNimble was lame of a leg,'
when Jemmy came in. He stopped, petrified at the sight.
`Och! is it you, you slapey elefant as is afther cuttin' thase didoes, and
shakin' the hotil as if a cotton bale was a dancin' a jig on the ruff. What is
in ye now? I niver seen the likes afore from ye!'
`I'm drunk, Jemmy. I've had a jolly tipple all by myself, Hey derry, ho
derry, dee!'
`Drunk?'
`Yes; master Nedward drinks, and so must Roundy. We are both goin'
to the devil together.'
`It's goin' down through the floor ye'll be, if ye kape dancin' and
bouncin'
about that a-way. Kape aisy a bit, and till us what's got ye.'
In the meanwhile the Champagne was brought to Edward, and the two
friends drank long and deep. Just as they had finished the bottle, and
Edward
was tipsily concluding within himself that he had drank enough if he
expected to accompany Miss Laurens to the theatre that night, the door burst
open and in come Roundy. Edward saw at a glance that he had been
drinking.
`Give us your fist, master Nedward. I'll be truetruetrue to you till
death. Catch me deserting you! Not as long as my name is Roundy Bee
BBeeBeebe!'
`You have been drinking, you rascal!'
`To beto be sure I have!'
`I shall send you back to the country tomorrow.'
`I wish I had sent you back three weeks ago. We are gone cases now,
master Nedward.'
`You are too tipsy to stand; go to bed!'
`I am tipsy, thou art tipsy, he is tipsy, we are tipsy, you are tipsy, they
are tipsy, 'deliberately stuttered Roundy in a very tipsy tone, supporting
himself
by the edge of the door, and looking round as he spoke at the chairs,
bed and tables, all which no doubt seemed, to his swiming head, quite as
tipsy as he was himself.
Edward and Harry laughed at his reply, the truth of which, ludicrous as
it was, both keenly felt; and Roundy having at length reeled out, the two
friends soon afterwards parted, Harry promising to see him again at the
theatre
.
CHAPTER VIII.
The moment Edward entered the drawing-room at Mr. Lauren's
mansion
,
Miss Laurens discovered, with that quickness of perception which
love gives to her sex, that he was under the influence of wine. His step
was gay, his manner bold, his color heightened. She had for some days
discovered with deep pain that the love of wine had taken a hold upon his
heart. She had only dared a look of reproof or caution, for she felt that
she had contributed her part to this dangerous temptation; nay, that but
for her invitation and encouragement he might not have taken the
first
glass
of wine! This self-condemnation was very bitter, and had caused her
many
unhappy hours; and she at length resolved that, if she was guilty in
leading
him to taste wine, she ought to use all her influence to prevail upon
him to stop ere it became a confirmed habit, when she knew that all her
happiness would be gone forever! But how to speak to him without
offending
him! She knew he was very sensitive, and the impression that she
thought him so far gone in intemperance as to feel it necessary to talk with
him, might perhaps, render the danger still greater.
`Ah, Anne, my love!' he said approaching her with an air of gallantry,
`you look divinely! charmingly! Really you will captivate my heart a
second
time! If Harry sees you to-night he will be sure to fall in love with
you!'
`Who do you mean by Harry?'
`Harry? why he is my chum! Harry Collins! first rate fellow, only a
little high spirited! He isno he
was
no he
is
in the army! He was in it
and was broken forforfordrinking they say. But he reformed, and
was restored again! Fine fellow! I must present him! Upon my soul, Anne,
you
do
look really irresistible! Ask me a favorany thing! that I may have
the happiness of doing something to show how much I regard you! Were
I Emperor of the land I would lay my empire at your feet!'
As Edward thus spoke in a lively, tipsy sort of way, with a very voluble
utterance, he knelt on one knee before her and laid his hand impressively
upon his heart!
Miss Laurens felt as if she should sink through the floor. She had
never
beheld him before so decidedly inebriated. Her heart was full and the
whispers of self-accusation made her tremble.
`Edward! rise up and do not make me wretched!' she said in a
tremulons
voice.
`Wretched!' he repeated springing to his feet, his countenance radiant
with smiles, and catching her hand and pressing it with extravagant warmth
and ardor, `
I
make you wretched! I that would die to'
`Cease, Edward! You just now asserted that you would do any thing I
asked of you!' she said in a serious voice.
`Were it the half of my kingdom!'
`Put an end to that light tone!'
`Can I be otherwise than light in the presence of the sun of all feminine
beauty?'
Miss Laurens sighed, withdrew her hand from his and silently seated
herself upon an ottoman nigh her, almost overcome with emotion. She
saw that, although he did not stagger, although he was neatly and richly
attired, that he was so much inebriated as not to be himself. His brain,
not his body was intoxicated. Tears came into her eyes, and she could
have shed them freely and bitterly.
He stood a moment gazing upon her as if struck with surprise. He then
approached her with a look as if he comprehended his own situation, and
the cause of her grief.
`Anne, I am very foolish. I have betrayed myself to you! I ask your
forgiveness. I met Harry and we indulged a little. Pardon me, I will not
offend again!'
`Edward, you wished me to name the favor I would ask. It is, that you
will
never
again drink wine! I condemn myself for asking you the first
evening
you were here. I have since suffered greatly for my imprudence.
Promise me, if you love me, that you will comply with my request!'
He remained standing before her thoughtful, His countenance became
very grave and a cloud passed across his brow.
`Anne, do you really think I am in danger of becoming intemperate?'
`I fear the worst, Edward!' she said earnestly.
`If I thought so I should cease to respect myself. I do not think so.
I know that I have too much character and self-esteem ever to give way to
intemperance. Do not fear, Anne! Your apprehensions are goundless. I
don't know but that I ought to be angry with you for even suspecting such
a thing of me! A gentleman may take a glass or two of wine at dinner and
not be called a drunkard. Surely you do not condemn your father!'
`You should have had too much delicacy to speak of him,' said Miss
Laurens. `But my father is a gentleman of the old school. He has
always
had his wine, and never drinks except at table, and moderately. I
would that he did not touch it at all. It is, however, his infirmity and I
must bear with it! But as for you'
`As for me, Miss Laurens,' said Edward quickly and with a flush of
displeasure
,
for his pride was touched at being thus arranged by her for a folly
he had already condemned himself for; `I do not conceive that I am worse
than Mr. Laurens. I do not see what reason you have to be so severe upon
me and at the same time defend another, but for whom, I frankly confess
to you, I should never have tasted wine. Your father placed the first glass
in my hand, and you pledged me to drink it, when I had already refused to
do it. If I am in danger of becoming an intemperate man, (which I do not
think is very likely,' he added haughtily) `I have more reason to condemn
than you have!' He ceased, and walked across the room with an angry
tread.
Miss Laurens covered her face with her hands and her bosom heaved
with deep emotion.
`Edward, Edward!' she cried with anguish and bitterness in her accents
and flying towards him, cast herself upon her knees before him, `oh,
Edward
,
if I have done this evil to you, I did it thoughtlessly! Forgive me,
and do not overwhelm me with such reproaches. I confess my error! I
implore
your forgiveness!'
`Anne,' he said raising her and pressing her to his bosom, `I am alone to
blame. I must ask forgiveness of you. I should not have said what I just
did if I had full control of myself. I solemnly swear to you that I am now
cured! I will drink no more wine!'
She looked up into his face with a smile of hope and encouragement
chasing away the tears and clouds, when Mr. Laurens entered.
`What so! Have I broken in upon a tender scene! Been quarrelling,
hey! I dare say it from your looks. Well, I am glad its made up. Lovers
have as many quarrels as married folks, only they are sooner over and they
love one another better for it afterwards; but the married folks dont! That's
the difference. Come, Anne, the carriage is at the door! We must be there
in time; so let us go into the other room and take a cup of tea and toast
and be off!'
By the time the carriage reached the theatre, Edward was perfectly
sober
;
though a sense of shame and a feeling of gloomy depression which
he could not throw off remained; being the natural reaction of the nervous
system after high artificial excitement, and which the wine drinker must
endure or remove by renewed stimulants.
The representation of Hamlet by the distinguished British tragedian must
have fulfilled the expectations of the large and fashionable audience
assembled
to witness it; if a judgment can be formed from the plaudits which
from time to time shook the house. Miss Laurens appreciated and
enjoyed
the piece with that pure pleasure which only can proceed from a well
cultivated mind and refined taste. Edward, for the time overcame his
gloom, and suffered the Magician of tragedy to carry him along with him
where he would.
In the interval between the fourth and fifth act as Edward bent down to
some remark made by Anne in reference to the last scene, there was heard
a sudden uproar in the lobby just outside of the box door, which was open,
and his ears were assailed by voices, crying,
`Turn him out!'
`You are a scoundrel!'
`You are a villain, sir!'
With these high words were heard sounds of a struggle with blows
mingled
,
as if one person was wrapping another over the shoulders with a cane.
The gentlemen in the box rushed out and so also did Edward, who thought
he recognized the tones of Harry Collins' voice in one of those that was
lifted up so loud.
On going into the passage he saw Harry and a gentleman grappling each
other, while the latter was endeavoring, as well as he could to use his cane
on the person of the former. A number of persons were trying to separate
them.
`You scoundrel, to insult a lady under my protection!' and up and down
again went the cane: but this time it was caught by Edward.
`Sir, this gentleman is my friend, what has he done?'
`Done! The drunken dog! I was coming out of my box with a lady,
when telling me that she had forgotten her fan, I imprudently quit her,
leaving
her standing in the lobby when this fellow, with the outside of a
gentleman
and wearing the button of a profession that should every where
stamp its wearer as a gentleman and man of honor, has the audacity to
throw his arm around her waist and ask her to take wine with him in the
saloon! The infernal'
`He is intoxicated, sir,' said Edward again arresting a blow. `You would
not beat a man who cannot defend himself!'
`He deserves to be kicked into the street, and you too, sir, if you take his
part!'
`I do sir?' demanded Edward in a determined tone.
`Yes, you do, sir, if you defend a blackguard!'
`The gentleman is no doubt to blame, but was probably under the
influence
of wine when he insulted the lady,' answered Edward with forced
calmness. Commit him to me, and I will answer for it, that to-morrow he
will make every apology that is required! As for
you
, sir,' he said in a low,
deep voice, `I shall expect you to apologize to
me
!'
Dme if I dont, Ned,' hiccupped Harry as the enraged gentleman
released his collar. `I say, Ned, you are a googoodgood fellow, you
are! a t-t-tr-
true
friend!'
`You may thank me, I do not give you up to the police!' said the
gentleman
very pale.
4
`I do thank you upon my s-s-sou-soul. I do p-p-p-'pon honor!'
answered
Collins tipsily for himself. `The fact is you are a coward to strike
(
hiccup
) a man with (
hiccup
) a cane! I'll have the satisfaction of a
gentleman
,
(
hiccup
)!'
`Come, Harry, let us go,' said Edward again sternly meeting the eye of
the man who had insulted him; and taking Collins by the arm he led him
into the vestibule and thence out towards the street. He now found his
friend was quite too much inebriated to walk steady. `Where have you
been to get so drunk?' he asked angrily.
`Drunk! Why I have been drinking, don't you know! I drank with you,
you know my boy! and then it was all down-hill after the first glass. I got
tipsy
jist as easy!
I have'nt tasted wine for ten months before to day!'
Edward felt as if he had received a heavy blow upon the breast. He
now saw the evil effects of his own indulgence in his friend. The
consciousness
that he had been instrumental in placing him in this condition
in which he saw him, cut him to the heart. He resolved that he would not
leave him to do any more mischief, but accompany him home in a carriage
and then return to the play.
`Remain here one moment, Harry, while I excuse my absence to Miss
Laurens. Don't stir from the spot till I return to you!'
Harry would have found it difficult to have done so, as he had drank a
great deal in the theatre and was now thoroughly drunk. He had drank
after he had parted from Edward at his rooms, partly from despair and
madness
at having been betrayed into drinking again, and partly to gratify the
resistless desire to drink deeper and deeper of the maddening cup which
he had so long kept from his lips, and which once more tasted made him
totally reckless of consequences.
While he stood there holding himself up by the door near the outer
entrance
of the theatre three or four young men came forth, and as they
passed
him one of them exclaimed,
`That is the fellow, now, Graham!'
`The young man turned round with a fiery air and fixing his flashing eyes
upon him advanced and said,
`So you are the villain that insulted my sister! Take that and that! I
have been looking for you! Take
that
!' And while speaking he pulled him
by the nose and kicked him and hurled him out of the door to the
sidewalk
with a force that cast him upon his back on which he fell with
violence
.
`You have hurt him!' cried the friends of the incensed brother.
`I care not if I have killed him!'
The fall and shock instead of stunning Harry sobered him so far as to
cause him to rise to his feet and attack his antagonist with drunken fury.
The conflict gathered a crowd, and the police officer appearing took Collins
into custody and two of them led him off between them notwithstanding
his desperate struggles to free himself.
When Edward a moment after reappeared and not finding his friend,
learned from the bystanders the circumstances, his first impulse was to
follow
and attempt to get him released; for he keenly felt how much he had
been to blame in the affair. While he was hesitating, a heavy hand slapped
him familiarly upon the shoulder and a voice he well knew, and started
to hear addressed him:
`Ah, Austin, how are you? You dont know me, hey?' said a young man
who looked very dissipated: His dress was ill put on; his neck-cloth awry,
and his eyes inflamed by drink.
`Is it you, Waldron?'
`You are as cold as salad! It is me. Come, Ned, let us have a glass of
wine together for old times!'
`You are intoxicated now! I dont wish any thing to say to you! Excuse
me, I have engaged with a party in the theatre!' answered Edward
distantly
.
`Oh, very well. You can keep sober and I cant,' said Ralph in a tone of
self-reproach and conscious degradation! `The truth is, Ned, that Hunting
Flask has been the ruin of me, and drink will be the death of me yet! I
wish I had taken your advice! Yes, I am tipsy, but I know what I am
saying
!
I wish I had taken your advice. I have got into a bad way; for,
getting
into the habit of drinking, I am now drunk all the time!'
`If you are conscious of this failing why don't you stop?' said Edward
surprised to hear him say so.
`I
must
drink! I dare not not be sober a minute! Do you know I have
lost every dollar of my money gambling! This it is makes me drink. I
keep the Hunting Flask full of brandy in my room and if I wake up at
night and find from my thoughts troubling me, I am getting sobered, then I
drink till I drown 'em! It is a horrid life, Ned! I wish I had followed your
advice. I have now only a four shillings left. I am going to-night to
venture
that, in a rum-hole, and if I lose it, as I dare say I shall, I shall then
become a gutter drunkard! I gamble in two-cent-a-glass cellars now! I
used to be good enough for Frankton's when I had my dollars! I have got
down to the two cent cut now! I am a poor devil, Ned!'
`You amaze me. I pity you, Ralph!'
`I don't want pity! You are a temperate man! keep so! never drink any
thing! The first glass may lead to hundreds! You are a respectable man!
I am a poor devil! Good night. Our careers lie different ways! When you
hear that I am dead, let me have one tear, Ned!'
`It is not too late to save yourself! You have such full consciousness of
your situation you can easily recover yourself!'
`No, Ned! I know I am going to hell. But I can't stop myself! There
is a fatality I must yield to! I have no control over my own will. I see the
right and do the wrong. A man who drinks gives the reins up to his
passion
for drink, and the whip to the devil, and then his story is told! Good
night, Ned!'
Thus speaking Ralph Waldron disappeared among the crowd, leaving
Edward overcome with pity for him, and overwhelmed with alarm for
himself
!
Ralph was now just at the close of that career through which we have
already followed him in chapter Fifth, when he left Frankton's gambling
halls penniless, and self-castaway.
Edward returned to the box where he left Anne, but the remainder of
the play he was silent; for his conscience and heart were both heavy. His
gloom was observed by Miss Laurens, and she resorted to every alluring
grace of conversation to draw him out of this mood, without success. He
scarcely listened to herseemed hardly conscious that he was in her
presence
.
At length the piece ended, and they left the theatre, Anne leaning
on Edward's arm. As they were about to enter the carriage Edward saw
coming out of the theatre the gentleman whom Harry had had the contest
with, and who had so grossly insulted himself. Instantly he was recalled
to what he conceived a duty due to his own honor, and which he had
forgotten
,
in reflecting upon poor Harry's fate. Not far from this person he
also saw a gentleman whom he had met several times at the hotel and whom
he knew to belong to one of the first families in town, though with rather a
flawry
reputation. Still he was a `gentleman' and as such Edward had met
him in society.
`The very man I want;' he said half aloud. `Excuse me an instant
Miss Anne,' he added as he handed her into the carriage and saw her
followed
by her father. He then crossed the walk to this person who was
leaning familiarly on the arm of De Witt Wittlesey, whom, however,
Edward
did not at first recognize.
`Mr. Levis, I wish to see you on some private business. Will you be
so kind as to call in at the Astor and await my return from Bleeker street.
I have to see a lady home, and will return at once!'
`Bay all means, moy daar fallow,' answered Fred Levis; `but oi was just
walking over to P's with Witt here, as ye spoke! youa know Witt!'
Wittlesey extended his hand eagerly to shake that of Edward with great
warmth; for they had already before met and been introduced to each other.
Edward did not like him, for he knew his character, and that he was a
friend of Waldron's. Therefore he said to Levis in a peculiar tone; `you
will be quite alone and disengaged, Mr. Levis, if not I will find some other
friend!
`Oh, quite alone! another friend, eh? what is it an
affair?
I did hear of
a row and some high words in the lobby, I wonder if'
Edward placed his finger upon his lip and Levis stopped.
`You will be there!'
`Say P's, as we were going there! I will await ye there!'
`Well, at P's in half an hour, answered Edward.
The next moment he was seated by the side of Miss Laurens in the
carriage
,
and entertained her in the liveliest manner as they rode; so that from
his excess of spirits, which he assumed to disguise his gloom of soul, she
began to fear he had taken wine. But Edward had not taken any wine
since he had left his hotel. The intoxicating influence of that had passed
off before he reached the theatre, but not so the effect. It left his mind as
we have seen in a dull, heavy humor, depressed and sullen. Cheerfulness
was banished, and dark feelings reigned in his thoughts. He was irritable
and sad at heart, and precisely in that crisis of temper which is most
dangerous
to its possessor. The least spark would kindle in the smouldering
furnace of his moody feelings, quicker than when his brain had been more
directly excited by the intoxicating ether of the wine he had drunk. It was,
therefore, that he took offence so quickly and resented so determinedly the
angry words of an incensed man; which, at any other time he would, with
the forbearance and dignified moderation characteristic of his noble nature,
have passed by forgiven and forgotten. The inebriate is ever the most
quarrelsome in the hours of depression and gloom that follow the false
spirits, which he has borrowed from the wine-cup. Edward, therefore,
though not under the immediate intoxicating influence of wine when he so
rashly and unadvisedly
committed
himself to the gentleman who had such
good cause to be enraged with Collins, and any who called themselves his
friends, was yet governed by its effects and in bondage to its power!
These reflections passed through his own mind as he rode back alone,
with leisure to think; and the evil-doer always thinks rightly and judges
correctly upon his own acts and the causes which led to them.
`This all comes of that hateful wine-drinking,' he exclaimed bitterly as
the coach drew up before P's brilliantly lighted
saloon
. `Oh Anne,
Anne if you knew into what peril and guilt I have been driven, you would
weep, weep, that you ever encouraged me to take that first glass of wine!
Step by step, with gradual but fearfully rapid progression, I have become a
confirmed wine drinker! and my, God! what has not my example done to
others! I have ruined poor Harry! I have been his tempter, well knowing
his failure and thatOh, God! I cannot dwell upon this! and if I think
about myself I shall go
mad!
'
He alighted from the coach and crossing the walk hurriedly entered the
dazzling hall, fearing to attract the notice of any grave citizen. He had
never before entered this luxurious scene of fashionable dissipation. He
stood an instant after entering, to survey the scene of Magnificence. It was
a vast apartment, panelled with mirrors, the walls adorned with rich and
voluptuous paintings, the ceiling exquisitely painted in fresco and colors,
and wherever his eye fell, it was agreeably surprised with the most tasteful
creatures of art, or dazzled with scenes of inconceivable splendor. From
a distant orchestra swelled the ravishing voices of beautiful singing girls,
mingled with the sounds of the harp and viol. The floor of the saloon was
thronged with guests, some walking up and down smoking cigars, others
standing in groups conversing with animation, others listening to the
singing
,
and commenting upon the richness of their voices, and the beauty of
their persons. Along the wall of glittering mirrors were ranged lines
of white marble tables, at which others were seated partaking of
refreshments
,
reading the news, or idly smoking and listening to the fair choristers.
At the extremity were seen open distant doors leading into apartments
exhibiting
scarcely less luxury. One of them Edward saw was a billard
room!
While he was making these observations, Levis, who had seen him, came
forward and took his hand.
`Ah, moy dare faller! Ye are as punctual as Time! Now Oi am at yer
serviss moi dare faller!' and as the fashionable young man spoke he
twirled
his gold eye-glass, levelled it from his eye at the singers and added, `foin
gearls. Austin! Foin voices,
charmant!
Ever been in here before?'
`Never.'
`Thought so, by your staring round! Shall be happy to show yer 'bout.!'
`I have first a favor to ask of you,' said Edward, who did not feel
altogether
at home in such a crowd.
`Command me, Austin! I am at yer serviss!'
`Can we be retired here a few moments?'
`Oh yes, come with me,' answered Levis placing his arm in his, and
walking
up the thronged hall.
CHAPTER IX.
Edward
suffered himself to be conducted the whole length of the
gorgeous
saloon, and passed with him into the billiard-room. This was an
elegant
hall, and the tables and furniture were of the richest description.
Several young gentlemen in blue or scarlet smoking caps, and round linen
jackets were at play, while at each table was stationed a beautiful young
girl as
marker
. Like the outer saloon there was an eye in the whole
arrangement
to the allurement of the young and gay: and youths
innumerable
here first caught the mortal infection of vice, concealed under a gilded
surface. There was many a fair youth but a few weeks from a hallowed
home, and for whom, perhaps, at the very moment that Edward was
gazing
round upon them with surprise at their number and youthfulness, the
prayer of a mother or sister were then ascending, that God would protect
them from the snares of the metropolis, and guard their hearts pure from the
vices that would tempt them from integrity and virtue.
`This is a sad scene,' thought Edward, as he crossed this apartment and
entered a small and elegant withdrawing room, richly carpeted and
curtained
,
and lined with velvet ottomans. It was softly lighted by solar lamps.
`Here we are alone,' said Levis, glancing round the room. `We are
fortunate
in finding it empty. This is on purpose for private conversations.
Now we are seated by this marble table, I am ready to hear you and to
serve you,' said Levis in a tone less affected than he had hitherto used.
`What I desire of you is this, my dear sir,' said Edward, and he then
proceeded to inform him of the scenes that had taken place in the lobby.
When he had ended Levis was thoughtful a moment.
`You say this person's name is Frazier?'
`So I was told by a by-stander of whom I enquired.'
`You did not give him your card, nor take his?'
`No; I merely said I should demand an apology for his language.'
`Certainly, my dear Austin. You could not let such a thing pass. You
did right. Frazier? had he gray eyes, and an imperial, with a fair
complexion
,
and tall, with great breadth across the shoulders?'
`Yes!'
`It is Douglas Frazier! He is addressing a Miss , whom I saw enter
the theatre with him, and it was she, doubtless, whom your friend Harry
Collins was so unfortunate as to insult so grossly. Douglas Frazierfor I
see you are about to ask me who he isis a man of good property, left him
by his mother. He has been abroad, returned with a mustache and
European
(that is a medley of French, English, German and Italian, with a touch
of the Russian manners and habits,) and now sets up for a fine man about
town. He has the reputation of having fought a duel in Austria with an
Englishman, but this is questionable. But he presumes much upon it, and
mainly depends upon this capital for his reputation.'
`You must take a note from me in the morning, Levis,' said Edward very
positively. I am willing now to overlook what he said to me, and if I
thought he would not expect to hear from me, I would let it drop, for I was
quicker than was advisable.'
`He will of course expect to hear from you. If you let it pass without
doing any thing after having so positively committed yourself, he would
proclaim every where that you were a coward.
`It is too late, I see, to withdraw. I will write a note which you shall
deliver
to him. It is, mark you, Levis, by no means my purpose to call him
out. A duel is farthest from my thoughts There is no doubt, when he
reads my note, that he will render me a full apology.'
`Perhaps,' answered Levis dryly and doubtfully; and by no means
desirous
that he should apologise; for like all idle men of his class he was in
his element with an affair of this kind, in fact, for the employment of his
passions and time; besides there is a sort of
eclat
attached to such matters,
greatly coveted by such persons.
There was on a side-table the most elegant arrangements made for writing.
Letter paper, gilded note paper, ivory handled pens, silver ink-stands,
particolored and fancy wafers, tasteful seals, were all at hand. While
Edward
was writing, Levis deliberately pulled the bell. It was answered by
a young girl.
`Champagne, my dear,' he said in a tone so as not to disturb his friend.
When Edward completed his note, he looked up to read it, and seeing
with surprise a bottle of Champagne and glasses standing on a silver waiter
before Levis, he turned pale and trembled; for he had, while in the
carriage
alone, on his way there, been thinking of wine to drive away his gloom,
but without the resolution either to banish the idea, or to indulge the
temptation
.
He now felt such a strong desire for it, on seeing it, (for he knew
it would deaden his sensibilities, which were to acute for his peace of mind,)
that he knew he should drink with Levis if invited; and therefore he had
shuddered: for `to will was present with him; but how to perform that
which is good he found not. The good that he would, he did not; but the
evil which he would not, that he did.' There was `a law in his members
warring against the law of his mind and bringing him into captivity' to the
law of death, and making him a bond servant to intemperance. He felt
this most bitterly, and felt like crying out with the Apostle though from a
different cause,
`
O wretched man that I am! who shall deliver me from the body of this death?
'
`Here is my note,' he said in a husky tone. `See if it will do.' And he
thus read:
`Sir,Last night you made use of language to me, which, as a gentleman
I cannot pass by. An apology is due to me; and I trust that you will not
hesitate to render one in the most unqualified manner to my friend Mr.
Frederick Levis, who will be the bearer of this note to you.
I have the honor to be, Sir.
Your Obedient Servant.
Edward Austin
.
P's, 11 1-2 P. M.
`It is the very thing, Austin,' answered Levis with delight. `You
understand
the phraseology
duello
, I see in superb style! I will take it to him in
the morning, while he is at breakfast. He boards at the Carlton. Now
my boy, let us take a glass of ChampaigneNapoleon brand. You look
fagged, and this will put life into you.'
`As he spoke, he cut the wire, the cork flew with a report, and the
foaming
wine sparkled in both of the tall glasses.
`Here's to your success with Frazier.'
Edward took up the glass and drank it off in and with a sort of
desperate
air. He had hardly set the glass down empty, when the door opened
gently and De Witt Wittlesey came half in, half retreated, and still held
the door without departing, but lingering as if expecting to be invited to
come in.
`Ah, De Witt, come in! we are through our little matters, said Levis.
`Perhaps I intrude' he said entering and shutting the door with great
confidence.
`No, come in and take a glass of wine.'
Before midnight, the three had drank six bottles of wine, and Edward
had to be escorted home between the two, who were only steadier than
himself because they had more seasoned heads. When they reached the
hotel they found themselves, however, too drunk to get to their own
lodging
and each of them having to be assisted up stairs by a pair of servants.
When Edward awoke the next morning, he found himself lying upon his
bed fully dressed with his boots, and even his hat on, which was jammed
tightly over his eyes. It took him some minutes to recollect himself, and
throw off a crowd of dreadful ideas that filled his mind. At length he sat
up in bed, and began to think. The event of the night rushed vividly upon
after another upon his consciousness. till unable to endure the horrors of
his feelings, he leaped from the bed and violently rung the bell.
`Bring me some brandy!' he demanded in a stern and sullen tone as the
servant entered.
It was brought to him on a waiter with water, sugar and lemon. He
had never drank brandy. But he had an instinctive feeling that it would
quicker hush his conscience than wine, for which he suddenly felt a
loathing
.
He prepared his draught and drank it off without suffering himself to
think upon what he was doing.
`Where is Roundy?' he fiercely interrogated the servant.
`He is in his room, sir.'
`What does he do there, the lazy fellow. Send him to me.'
`His leg, sir.'
His leg! What do you stand the gaping for? What do you mean by
his leg?'
`We told you when you came home last night, sir.'
`Told me? IIrecollect being told nothing.'
`You know, sir, he broke his leg.'
`Broke his leg? Roundy?' asked Edward in amazement.
`Yes, Sir. You see he got somehow to drinking after dinner, and got
tipsy, sir; and as he war'nt used to it, it turned his brain, and so he went
to dancing on the sky light, sir, and fell thro', as of course he would, to the
next floor, and broke his leg!'
`And you say he is in bed? Has a surgeon been with him?'
`Oh, yes, Sir. Every thing was done for him, and I heerd one o' the
women
say as how he was easier this mornin' sir.'
Edward buried his face in his hands, groaned heavily with anguish of
soul, and sunk down by his bedside with his face in his pillow.
`Poor Roundy! Poor, poor Roundy! This is my act! I have done this!
I!
Oh, God where will the consequences of my folly end!'
He lay sometime giving himself up to despair and self-accusation; at
length he rose up and went to see the simple victim of his example.
When the poor youth saw him enter, his eyes brightened, and he
suppressed
a groan of suffering.
`I am glad to see you, Master Nedward,' he said affectionately.
`Poor Roundy! This is a sad accident!'
`If I live 'twill cure me, Master Nedward!'
`Cure you?'
`Yes, Master Nedward! I was takin' to drinkin' and I dont know what
would ha' been the end and upshot if I had'nt broke my leg. But its a
lesson
.
I'd rather broked my leg than been a drunken dog! Its cured me
Master Nedward. I only tried it once, and here I am for it!' here Roundy
groaned with pain.
`You suffer a great deal!
`Not so much as I did, Master Nedward, when the doctor and four men
sot my leg. But I dont suffer on my own account. It is'nt my bones as I
suffers most in; its thinkin.'
`Thinking?'
`Yes. I thinks about you, Master Nedward, and this troubles me. I see
you are getting to love wine, Master Nedward, and it makes me so sorry
that I don't think any thing o' my pains a thinking on it! Do, Master
Nedward
,
stop right off short, and never take another glass o' wine so long as
you live, and your mother lives! Think of her and how wretched she'd be
if she knew'
`There, there, good Roundy, that will do,' interrupted Edward, who could
not recal the idea of his mother, without anguish, and who felt every word
of the poor serving-man sink into and pierce his heart. `I will do as you
say, Roundy.'
`Wont you drink no more, Master Nedward?
`No, Roundy, I will not.'
`Good, kind master! Oh, I am so happy!' cried the grateful Roundy;
and catching Edward's hand to his lips he covered it with kisses and
bathed
it with tears of joy.
Edward was deeply moved. He remained an hour with his servant, till
the surgeon came, of whom he anxiously inquired about his situation. He
was told that it was a compound fracture, and that it would be many weeks
before he would be able to go out; the surgeon also told him that his
exceeding
fleshy condition would render a fever fatal, and that he must be
kept perfectly quiet, as he was threatened with one, from the heated state
of his blood, caused by the wine, porter and even rum, he was informed he
had been drinking, just before the accident.
It can be easily imagined with what emotions Edward heard this last
statement made. After the surgeon left, and while he was making and
strengthening new resolutions in his mind, a servant came in for him. On
going to his room he found Mr. Levis awaiting him.
`Well, my dear fellow! Buthow haggard you look! You don't stand
late hours and champaigne like me! I was up with the larkdrank a
bottle
of pure soda-water, poured another over my head and chest, sent to the
bar for a bittered brandy sling
strong
, and in half an hour I was as good as
new! Hearing you were in bed, I thought I would'nt disturb you, so
breakfasted
with De Witt, who is almost as heavy as you are, and started off to
find my man!'
`And found him?'
Yes, in a dressing room, taking his coffee. I was shown into his room
having first sent up my card with `on particular and pressing business,'
written on it in pencil. I entered and as we had already met several times
we shook hands; but formally declining the chair he desired me to occupy,
I handed him your note. He read it, and bless me if he moved a muscle
of his face. When he had done, he folded it up, and in the most quiet way
imaginable, and smiling gently as he regarded me, said, confoundedly
polite.
`Be so civil, Mr. Levis, as to return to Mr. Edward Austin, as I believe
he signs himself, (and here he put up his eye-glass to take a cool second
look at your signature) and say to that personage that I have no apology to
make to him, and that I think, really, that he is inconceivably impertinent in
presuming to ask me for one!'
Edward's brow looked as dark as the storm-cloud when charged with the
thunder bolt. He sprang to his feet and stood like a statue of fierce and
fiery anger. He had hoped secretly that the apology would be tendered.
He believed that it would be; and he had not let the result give him the
least uneasiness or concern. Surprise and disappointment now sharpened
and gave sting to his quick resentment at this insulting reply.
`Mr. Levis, that man I must meet.'
`I see no alternative, sir,' answered Levis, his eyes sparkling with secret
satisfaction.
I will write! will you bear my note?'
`With pleasure.'
`In a few moments Edward read what he had written.
`Sir: My friend, Mr. Levis, is authorized to arrange on my behalf, with
any friend you may name, the preliminaries usual in settling affairs between
gentlemen holding, in relation to each other, the position we now do.
Very Respectfully,
Edward Austin
.
After Mr. Levis had departed on his hostile mission, Edward paced the
floor with feelings of the most painful nature. He had created for himself
a world of misery and despair that seemed to close around him darker and
narrower, and from which there seemed no way of escape.
`So I am involved in a duel,' he said savagely, yet with poignant grief
pressing the hot tears from his eyes. `Well, I must abide it; Oh, Thought
and Conscience! Ye are fiery foes to the evil doer! I would I could
annihilate
both! I
can
render them insensible; Brandy will do it; no,
no!
NO!!
I will not fly to
that
! I have promised Roundy; Poor Roundy! How he
kissed my hand, when I richly merited his curses! But I cant endure these
reflections; I cant think of himnonor of myself.'
`Did you ring, sir?'
`Ring? no;' yet he had rung the bell, and violently, in his walk up and
down his chamber; but he did it unconscious of the act, and without
intent
.
`But stay; what is that you have in your hand?'
`The Morning Paper.'
`Leave it with me, and bring me a glass of water. And then I want you
to go to the counting room of Mordent, Godine & Co. and tell them I am
indisposed
,
and shall not be there to-day.Now let me divert my mind from
itself,' he said throwing himself into a chair. `Politics'pah! `Dreadful
Accident!' `Conflagration!' Police Reports! Hah, what is this? Lieut.
Henry
Collins!
His
name
here!
what can this mean!'
He read with horror, as follows:
`
Painful Event
.We regret to record the death by suicide of Lieut.
Henry Collins in the Police lock-up, where he was found dead this morning
hanging by the neck to one of the bars of the inside lattice door, having
hung himself with one of his suspenders. He was, we learn, taken there
for having, in a state of intoxication, insulted a lady at the theatre. Being a
young gentleman of a high sense of honor, though in this unfortunate
condition
for the time, it is supposed that on realizing his degrading situation
this morning, he yielded to his morbid sensitiveness, and fearing again to
meet the eyes of the world whose courtesies he had outraged, he fled to
suicide!
`What renders this event peculiarly painful, is the fact, whtch we have
just now learned, that this young gentleman was at one time addicted to
such intemperate habits, as to render it expedient that he should leave the
army; but that he afterwards became so thoroughly reformed that for some
months he has been in the service again; and up to yesterday he has not
been known to indulge even in a glass of wine. What unhappy and sudden
temptation has been instrumental in leading him to the sad fall, and
melancholy
end, it is not in our power to explain.
The Coroner gave in his verdict in accordance with the above facts.'
Edward sat several minutes with the open newspaper before him, and
with his gaze fixed on the paragraph, transfixed and motionless as a statue;
Gradually an expression of horror grew upon his features; his complexion,
flushed while he read, became the hue of ashes, his eyes glared wildly;
suddenly a sharp, wild cry like the rending of a human soul, escaped his
lips, and he sprang to his feet with an air of desperate frenzy. He
tottered
,
recovered himself, pressed his hands to his temples and stood for at
least ten minutes in that attitude without motion. Who can tell what
thoughts, what torture of thought occupied his mind in this interval? At
length he dropped his hands and clasping his fingers with nervous horror,
he exclaimed, bitterly, bitterly, most bitterly.
`My cup is full! It is poured in to the brim! I am not only a drunkard,
but a murderer! I have
murdered
my friend! Despair! Madness! I am your
victim!' He rushed across the chamber with outstretched arms and glaring
eye-balls, as if he would have embraced the dreadful images he invoked,
when a knock was given upon the door.
With an effort that seemed almost superhuman, he all at once controlled
his feelings, and he said with a forced, but extraordinary calmness,
`Come in!'
Levis entered. Edward smiled thourgh the ghastliness of his visage and
said, in the same forced tone of composure, but with a depth that made his
friend start!
`Well?'
`You look ill!'
`It is nothing! What said the gentleman?' he demanded so sternly that
Levis stepped back a pace and gazed on him with surprise.
He read your missive with the most consummate coolness, and then
referred
me to a friend! It was, who do you think, but Wittlesey! I saw him
and we have arranged every thing for our respective principals. You are
to meet at sunset this evening at Hoboken. Weapons pistols, and if these
fail, small swords. This is Frazier's choice, and he seems confoundedly
savage
.
`I am satisfied,' responded Edward in a perfectly unmoved voice.
`Then there is nothing to do but get ready. Have you weapons?'
`I don't own neither pistol or sword.'
`That is nothing. You can purchase them at 's in Broadway.
Suppose we walk that way.'
`No, I shall not go out. I leave it to you. Purchase for me the weapons
required. There is a hundred dollar note! If they come to more, I will
pay it. Arrange every thing yourself. I wish to have no trouble.'
`
Bein
, my dear fellow! You shall not complain; I will have you ready by
noon. You will want to cross over a couple of hours before sunset to
practice
a bit; or suppose you go and pass the afternoon in the pistol gallery!'
`No. I shall not practice; I shall not practice!' answered Edward in a
tone of gloomy determination.
`Are you so good a shot then? a swordsman too?' that is capital! I
should be glad to see you put a point or a bullet, under that confoundedly
cool fellow's doublet. By the by, what surgeon will you have?'
Edward, at first, made no reply. He seemed, all the while, to be wishing
his second would terminate his visit. Levis had to repeat the question.
`It is of no consequence. I will have
none!
'
`Very well; That shows a confidence in yourselfI like. But it would
be safer.'
`
Safer!
' repeated Edward in a tone of contempt; `
safer!
who seeks
safety.
Not I
.'
`I did not mean you were a coward, my boy.'
`Coward! Oh, no! I am
no
coward; Oh no, I have no fears, sir;' and
looking his friend in the face he laughed so strangely that Levis turned
pale.
`You are devilishly odd, Austin; One don't know what to make of you.'
`No, I dare say; call here at 5 o'clock and I will be at your service,' he
said in a commanding tone.'
`Wont you dine with me?'
`
No!
'
Levis started, looked as if he would like to take offence at the quick,
stern negative given him, and then bidding him good morning, he slowly
left the room.
CHAPTER X.
The golden sun of an autumn evening was just withdrawing his level
beams of light from amid the woodlands of Hoboken, leaving behind, the
softly gathering shadows of twilight, when a boat, rowed by a single
oarsman
,
and containing two gentleman, landed at the base of a rock, under the
covert of a vast oak. They were Edward Austin and Frederick Levis.
The former, wrapped in a cloak, walked silently along the shore towards a
level area by the water-side, in which stood a monument erected to one
who had fallen on the spot where it stood, a victim to the laws of honor,
falsely so called. A lingering sun-beam still lighted up the summit, but
disappeared a moment after Edward's eye had rested upon it. He sighed,
for he believed and
hoped
that it was the last sunlight he should ever behold.
Levis followed him with a case beneath his arm, and a small sword carefully
wrapped up and disguised in paper.
`It was a curious whim of Frazier to choose sunset!' he said, `But I
suppose it is that escape may be more easily effected, with a night before
one, in case the affair should draw blood. Ah! they are there! I thought
the four oared boat that landed a quarter of a mile above us, must have
been their party. There is with Frazier, Wittlesey and Dr McDonald!'
As he spoke, the three persons named appeared in a path leading from a
group of trees, and took up a position a few paces from the monument.
Levis, placing his case of pistols on the ground, opened it, and laid them
out; he also unrapped the shining sword and tried its elastic temper by a
few thrusts in the air. De Wittlesey then came forward, and Levis met
him, they bowed formally and proceeded to preliminaries. Wittlesey
tossed
a dollar into the air, and to Levis fell the choice of positions. He
looked
around and resolved to place his principal with the rocks and trees for a
back ground, so that Frazier would have to stand with the bright river
which reflected the glowing sky behind him, bringing his person into full
relief. Ten paces were then paced off by Levis, and the places where each
was to stand indicated by a little stick stuck in the green sward.
These matters being arranged, which Edward stood alone observing,
with folded arms and an air of gloomy abstraction, the two seconds
proceeded
to load the pistols under each others supervision. This done they
measured the swords against each other by laying them side by side, and
having ascertained that they were of equal length they declared that they
were ready for their principals to take their places.
Levis placed a pistol in Edward's hand. He took it mechanically.
`Throw off your cloak, my dear Austin! You seem to forget!'
`Oh, ah! true!' he said with a smile of derision, and a look of ghastly
despair.
`Pray be cool and calm,' said Levis who began to think Austin might be
a coward.
`Cool? Look at me in the eyes! are they shrinking think you! Behold
my hand as I thus level my arm, does it shake? Does my voice tremble?
Oh,
no!
' he laughed hollowly;
I wish it did!
Frazier shook hands gaily with his surgeon, took his position, received
his cocked weapon from his second's hand, and examined the lock with the
most perfect coolness. The surgeon retired a little from the line of fire,
and De Wittlesey stood near by him. Levis shook hands with Edward, but
shrunk from the look of anguish and woe he fixed upon him as he said in
a deep, but tremulous voice,
`Farewell! good night! Forever
good night!
night,
night
, NIGHT, forever
night!'
`Are you ready?' cried Wittlesey, to whom it had fallen to give the word.
`Ready,' responded Frazier firmly.
`Ready,' echoed Edward mechanically.
`
Fire
!
one, two, three!
'
Frazier raised his pistol at the word `fire,' levelled it, and lingered till the
word `three' (between which words they must fire, or not at all,) hoping to
draw his antagonists fire first; but seeing Edward did not raise his
weapon
,
and supposing him waiting for the same, he fired at the word `three.'
At the instant, he drew the trigger, Edward raised his weapon and
discharged
it towards the river, when the ball from Frazier's pistol striking the
upraised
weapon in his hands shattered the stock, and hurled it from his
grasp.
`Folly, Austin,' cried Levis with surprise and indignation. `Why were
you so insane as to throw away your shot?'
`I do not wish to do murder in cold blood! Oh, no! I have done murder
enough!' he answered hoarsely. `If I should kill him, even brandy would not
make me forget! It will not make me forget, Harry, poor Harry! I can't live
and think! And Roundy too!'
`For Heaven's sake, Austin, what is the matter!'
`Nothing, nothing! where are the swords? Be ready with them. Do you
not see 'tis growing
night!
Darkness comes to witness our doings! The
swords, I say!'
Levis handed him his sword with a look of surprise. He could not
account
for conduct, the secret of which was hid from his knowledge in the
depths of the broken and wrecked bosom before him. He knew that it
was not cowardice, for from first to last, Edward had not shown fear.
`He is a strange fellow! One would think he came here to be shot! He
seems a misanthrope who is weary of life, and would make Frazier his
executioner
!
Gentlemen are you ready?'
The two combatants advanced and crossed blades with a clash. Edward
was a good small-swordsman, having had a great deal of practice with foils
in college. Frazier in his attitude and parries showed himself a master of
the weapon. He was remarkably cool. Edward was no less composed,
but it was a stern and terrible composure. They exchanged a few passes,
and then each retreated a pace. As they did so, Edward beckoned to
Levis.
`Sir, if I fall, you will find a package of letters in my desk, at my room.
Deliver them as addressed.'
He again assumed his position, and their swords rung and struck fire.
`I must needs make seeming effort, or he will not press me, and give me
the death I covet,' he said within himself; and then so closely did he
engage
and urge his antagonist that for a few moments Levis was sure that
Frazier would fall.
All at once a quick, loud cry of exultation escaped from Frazier;
Edward's
sword flew from his hand and he reeled and fell his whole length
upon the sward. Levis was at his side in an instant, and supporting his
head upon his knee. The surgeon also hastened to his succor. Frazier
stood by, with a flushed cheek, sparkling eyes, and compressed lips, very
deliberately wiping the ensanguined point of his sword, by thrusting it into
the earth.
`The steel has penetrated his heart! He is dead already,' said the
surgeon
in tones of surprise and pity.
Dead
, say you!' demanded the murderer, changing color.
`Dead Sir.'
`Fly, Frazier!' exclaimed Wittlesey. `This is no place for us.'
Levis seeing that his principal was dead, let his head lay upon the ground,
and rose to his feet.
`He
is
gone, Doctor!' he said, shaking his head.
`
Gone!
' answered the surgeon, in a tone of compassion. A noble young
man. I knew him slightly. Not a more promising person in town! 'Tis a
pity!'
`He was engaged and soon to be married too, to the rich Miss Laurens,'
said Levis. `It is a confounded unfortunate affair. But he had something
on his mind, that led me to believe he wished to fall! And, poor fellow,
there he lies!
`Doctor,' said De Wittlesey, we are going to cross the river. Will you
accompany us? We have no time. We intend to take the early five o'clock
boat for Boston, till the affair is blown over.'
`Yes. I can do nothing here! I will go.'
`For God's sake gentleman, don't leave me here with the corpse,' cried
Levis.
`There is no alternative! You have a boat and oarsmen. They must do
for you. We can't wait,' answered Wittlesey whose voice, looks and
manner
betrayed alarm and a selfish desire of personal security.
The three hastened to the boat and soon put off and were lost in the
darkness that was rapidly falling over land and wate. Levis hurried away
from the fatal spot, leaving the body of the unfortunate Edward stretched
out along and cold upon the ground. In a few moments Levis returned
with the two men and they bore the body to the boat and put off from the
shore, leaving the scene of such deeds of violence as had just been enacted
there, reposing quiet and still beneath the stars and deep blue sky. The
darkness covered the blood upon the green sward, and hid the
passiontrampled
ground. But the cry of blood went up from the steeped earth to
the ear of the Invisible, and the recording angel wrote down another
murder
upon the page of the record of human crimes!
It was a melancholy half hour for Levis while the boat was reaching the
city from the duelling ground; for with all that levity and selfishness of
character which belongs to men of his class, he could not but deeply
lament
the untimely end of his friend; and especially as he believed he had
thrown his own life away, rather than fallen in a fairly contested and equal
field.
Landing at the foot of Hammersley street, he despatched one of the men
for a coach, and placed the body in it. He resolved to drive directly to the
house of Mr. Laurens, instead of to the hotel, which would be too public
for himself; as it was necessary for his own safety that he should not be
known to have been concerned in this fatal affair. He had secured the
services
of the boatmen by large bribes, and the coachman's secrecy and
services
had also to be secured by the same means.
Having placed the body in the coach, he paid them and gave them orders
to drive with it to No  Carrol Place. `When you get there, one of you
go and ring the bell, ask for Mr. Laurens, and give him this card. He will
take care of the body!'
Levis had written upon a card with pencil, as well as he could, under a
lamp-post that stood not far from the lauding as follows:
`Sir,These men bring you the body of Mr. Edward Austin who fell this
evening, just after sunset, in a duel with small swords at Hoboken.
(Signed) His Second.
`P. S. The delicacy of my position in reference to this important
occurrence
,
must excuse me both from appearing before you and giving my
name. A package which Mr. Austin left directed to you, will be sent to
your house in the morning.'
Anne Laurens was in the drawing-room reading aloud from the evening
paper to her father. She was nervous and anxious; for she had not seen
Edward
that day, when it was his duty, even if he had not been in the habit of
calling daily, to wait upon her to inquire about her health, after having been
with her the previous night at the play. But she had neither seen him, nor
had a line from him. Mr. Laurens had taken a cold by the previous night's
exposure, and could not go out, or she would have urged him to call and
see if Edward was ill. She feared indeed that this was the reason she did
not see him, as he had appeared to her far from well when he left her after
seeing her home.
Evening had come, and now she thought that he would certainly come if
he were not really ill. Her father, seeing her anxiety, got her to read the
newspaper to him; but she read without her thoughts, until she lighted
upon a very touching account of the suicide of Harry Collins, which she
read with emotion.
`Collins! The same young gentleman that dined and took wine with us
yesterday! Is it possible?' exclaimed Mr. Laurens, and he caught the paper
from her. The paragraph was in substance like that Edward had read, and
which had driven him to the anguish and remorse which led him, along
with a stinging sense of lost self-esteem, to throw away his life! It however
contained in addition this to sentence.
`We learn that the unfortunate young officer was seen taking wine at
table
with two gentlemen, one of whom, by his age and standing in society
should have known better than to place the tempting wine-cup in the hands
of young men. If old
respectable
men must drink wine, let them drink it
alone, not where their example will lead young men astray. It has been
asserted by a friend of the deceased Mr. Collins, who sat near him, that he
had not touched wine when he left the table, but that he afterwards was
seen seated half an hour taking wine with these persons!'
`My God! That alludes to me!
I
am
the man!
cried Mr. Laurens with
a groan of anguish. `Anne I have done my part to kill that young man!
This is horrible! I never before conceived that I have been doing wrong in
taking wine! But see what it has brought this poor young man to! But
then. I did not take the first glass of wine with him!'
`Who did?' asked Anne pale and trembling at this self-condemnation of
her parent.
Mr. Laurens would have recalled his last words, but it was too late. He
had to reply, but saw at once in what position it would place one so dear to
her.
`It was Edward! He asked him to take a glass of wine with us! But
he nor I did'nt know
`Oh, my father, my father! Do not speak one word more! I cannot bear
this! who first taught Edward?
YouI
alone are guilty! He, he is
innocent
!
We are
The street bell sharply rung.
`It is he! Oh, I trust he has not heard of this poor young man's fate! It
would drive him to despair!'
`Mr. Laurens, here is a card for you!' said Plato, pale and trembling.
`From
him!
' she cried with a glow of pleasure, and extending her
hand.
Mr. Laurens read the first line and suddenly covered his face.
`Father! what is it?' she cried, `Is he ill?'
He recovered himself, and read again. His face was like marble. She
stood with folded hands and eager looks, and scarcely less pale than he,
from anticipation of some evil.
`Anne!' he said extending his hands; `Anne, my child, God has judged
me! Read,
read
, for II cannot tell it you!'
We forbear pursuing the painful scene that followed! The pen fails us in
the attempt to describe the horror and anguish, the remorse and despair
the utter woe of that hour!
The body of the murdered young man was laid out and coffined; and
the next day but one, it was born to the tomb, followed by a
broken-hearted
mother, by a maiden with a wild brain, and reason wandering, and by an
old gentleman who seemed the very picture of despair and remorse, and
who ceased not to weep like a child, and at intervals call down upon
himself
the curses of divine vengeance.
`As the hearse returned from the place of sepulture, it was detained a
moment by a crowd gathered around something on the ground. It was the
body of a dead man. He had been ejected, a few moments before, from a
miserable rum hole on the corner of the next alley, and being too much
intoxicated
to take care of himself, he had fallen down and lay in the sewer
with his head against a lamp post, when a cart, driven by a drunken
carman
in turning the corner had struck him with the wheel in the brenst,
thrown him down and passed over his head mangling it in the most
shocking
manner.
The body was taken to the dead house in the Park, and in his pocket was
found the stopper of a Hunting Flask (that having been long since sold for
rum,) on which was engraven the name of `
Ralph Waldron
, from his friend
W. De Wittlesey.' The same afternoon a pine coffin received the remains
of the young huntsman who had thus fallen a victim to intemperance, and
his body was taken to the Potter's field and thrown into a grave
promiscuously
with the miserable dead of that week; for there were none to care
for him in the tomb of his family, which remained yet ignorant of his
miserable
end.
Roundy, the faithful and simple Roundy, recovered after a long time,
only with life, and the loss of his leg which it was found necessary to
amputate
.
He never ceases to mourn his young master's death. Those who
feel an interest in him, are informed that he is now returned to his native
town, and that the thin, slender, skeleton-looking man with a wooden leg,
and a melancholy aspect, who keeps a little cake shop near the village Inn,
is the individual in question.
Mr. Laurens began rapidly to fail. Wine was recommended and
prescribed
by his physicians, to revive his strength; bul he firmly refused to touch
it, saying that death was preferable to existence, prolonged by that which
had been the death of Edward; for he had learned by the letters left by
Edward, the whole history of his temptations, just as the reader has learned
them, and knew that he had placed in his hand the cup which had been
drugged with his death. In two months, he followed to the tomb his
victim
!
Poor Anne never recovered her reason. She remained a few months an
inmate of the asylum at Bloomingdale, and, at length died, in her last
words denouncing herself as the murderer of Edward.
THE END
.Howard Hotel
,
Nov.
5, 1842.
`
Sir
,Having withdrawn my money from bank, I withdraw myself from
the firm. Ask me for no explanations; for I have none to give. I have
chosen my own course and must abide by it.
Ralph Waldron
.`Sir,Last night you made use of language to me, which, as a gentleman
I cannot pass by. An apology is due to me; and I trust that you will not
hesitate to render one in the most unqualified manner to my friend Mr.
Frederick Levis, who will be the bearer of this note to you.
I have the honor to be, Sir.
Your Obedient Servant.
Edward Austin
.
P's, 11 1-2 P. M.`Sir: My friend, Mr. Levis, is authorized to arrange on my behalf, with
any friend you may name, the preliminaries usual in settling affairs between
gentlemen holding, in relation to each other, the position we now do.
Very Respectfully,
Edward Austin
.`Sir,These men bring you the body of Mr. Edward Austin who fell this
evening, just after sunset, in a duel with small swords at Hoboken.
(Signed) His Second.
`P. S. The delicacy of my position in reference to this important
occurrence
,
must excuse me both from appearing before you and giving my
name. A package which Mr. Austin left directed to you, will be sent to
your house in the morning.'